I've never pictured myself living in the "Deep South" before, being someone who could be described as part of many different counter-cultures from Atheist to Socialist and everything in between, but if living on an Army base has taught me anything it's that you can have a perfectly lovely time with people who are 90% different from you, as long as you can find that 10% to talk about and avoid the heavy shit. I have plenty of social activity here on base with people I only have knitting or baby wearing in common with, but few people I really connect with. I'm sure that without a language barrier between myself and the general population my friend-options will be much broader! I've already found a La Leche League and an Attachment Parenting group in the area, and we plan to join the UU church as well. I also plan to try and make it to the yoga classes on post, and maybe try to get up to Atlanta to do a Hoopdance workshop or two.
She's VERY, VERY SPARKLY!!!!! I had a bit of a disaster with her wings :( I had them coloured and blended nicely, using 2 different colour families and decided to try out my new tub of SU Champagne Shimmer Paint...BAD MOVE!!!!....made her wings look all muddy...GRRRRRRR...was supposed to make them all beautiful and shiny! This was the last touch to finish the image and I thought I was going to have to bin her and start again...not happy Jan!!! My wonderfully inventive friend, Helen was here and suggested I try the new iridescent SU embossing powder to see if it would fix it...it's definitely IRIDESCENT lol (I love it and will get some next time I order) It helped but I'm still not 100% happy with it as it's not what I envisioned :(...and they looked so lovely before I stuffed them up!! Oh well, you live and learn...and that's one thing about me, I won't make the same mistake twice!! The leaves wrapped around her dress are finished with SU Crystal Effects.
Moved back to Wales at last. A million times better here, close to the sea, warmer (a little) and closer to things that are going on. Been to the beach for some location scouting, good stuff.
They have big factions in China, in the US and in Europe – both against and for them. It crosses borders.
On Tuesday 12/28, I called our SW to talk to him about the possibility. He was very concerned about us trying to adopt this boy for a number of reasons. He said he understands our compassion for these kids, but that we can't "rescue" all of them. I tried to reason with him some, but also told him I understood his concerns. He said he was not in favor of it, but he wasn't opposed to it. He also said that if we truly felt this was God's will for our family, that he would not stand in our way.
Dear Joey
Mostly because I am at a new place, personally ~ I have grown in the two years
Well, the message is out, and boy, are people fired up.
Genres : Action, Comedy
The same roasted malt presence in the nose dominates the taste, accompanied by a slightly burnt character. There is also a very vague notion of wood and tobacco that may have been the hops coming underneath the malt. My glass was empty in no time, and a very nice aftertaste of burnt malt lingered as a reminder.
For those of you local to DC and Arlington in particular, you might enjoy checking out this new undergrad course at George Mason’s Center for Consciousness and Transformation.
If you like baking with almond flour and enjoy the benefits of a Gluten-Free diet, then this cookbook is for you:
So even with a 45% drop in high sec mining, it is still the place where most of the ore is harvested. High sec accounts for nearly double the ore as the rest of space, even with Hulkageddon in full forces.
oh...and shaun. he's super dad. seriously. the man POTTY TRAINED dustin while i was gone! so now i have only one kiddo in diapers. it's happily weird. and i'm even more in awe of the man God has blessed me with. and throughout the trip i was in awe of the friends God has blessed me with...even states away. veronica and her family are awesome hosts and i'm so grateful for them!
I don’t understand where she got that idea, but regardless, she had it, and I thought that it was ludicrous – no offense to anyone.
Insight on Freedom (blog)
belt - vintage
so you cut me with your callous words
So two days later, I was somewhat sore, but undeterred, and headed out again excited after my previous success … and achieved the same distance I had the first day, but with much more effort. My throat burned and my lungs ached and my legs were definitely sore and sluggish. I arrived back home a little discouraged, but thinking that I could probably push through.
Fag hags as Wikipedia states are often stereotyped as, “outgoing women who are seeking a substitute for heterosexual relationships, or who are secretly (or openly) attracted to gay men.” Wikipedia goes on to say a bunch of other interesting things like and I’m sort of paraphrasing, “There are also straight women who have an open sexual interest in gay or bisexual men, these women are called, GIRLFAGS.” Whaaaaattt? Girlfags??!! I have another name for them – SELF-MASOCHISTS. I mean, who in the hell would want to run a race when you’re never given a shot at the prize? Like that lady from the band, Garbage says, “Stupid girls.”
The next day I worked her lightly at home first on the longe to assess her soundness, (she seemed fine) so I rode her just walk trot. She was great and is much more wiling to relax and stretch her neck down. Every day she feels stronger and more balanced. I have taught her leg yields and also turn on the haunches, which she is quite good at.
Joseph Smith, History of the Church, 6:408-9
03-Nero & The Gladiators - In The Hall Of The Mountain King
We were all crazy about our little Tomboys. I don't know why I waited so long to put this on the baking list, but all I want to do now is bake it again. And I'm not the only one.
About 100 individuals have lost their jobs due to the fire and nearby restaurants are closed due to smoke damage. Shops were cleaned yesterday.
The movie tells the story of two nerdy brothers going to college and the problems they face when they realize they are nerds and not very popular among the other students, except among the other nerds. They battle against discriminating jocks and cheerleaders.
Look Ma! They all stuck!
This is my first written foray into the world of consciousness/philosophy of mind – I would appreciate any and all constructive criticism in this area.
1/2 tsp cayenne (or to taste. this stuff is spicy! wow!)
Pear Pizzazz Cardstock
Sometimes: Things break...like my car battery this weekend.
“Do you know why I’ve asked you in here?” she asked me
Where ambition and drive has brought you
There are many books on writing craft but You Are A Writer (So Start Acting Like One) is one that nurtures the human spirit. It reminds us why many of us choose to become writers in the first place. It illustrates the ability to use our craft to reach out to others and make a difference. This is an inspirational book filled with personal stories, insights, and real struggles.
Imtithal, Saameira and Maisa: Yes, master?
Noreen & Hunter
She was right of course. But if that crazy FIGU member doesn’t get me then, she might get me later.
I'm sure Lisa didn't find it easy picking her Top3 - please scroll down to the previous post to see if you were one of the lucky ones :o)
Dare, wow. He was fantastic. I loved his sexual tension, his macho tendencies and his love for his dogs and friends. Chris who was a friend was delightful. He was quirky and just right. As with Molly she was incredible with her strength through the entire plot. As the reader you cheered her on.
WordPress
Maybe I shouldn't be having a blog entry announcing this fact but you know what, Jamie? It's an incredible achievement no matter how I talk about it.
Adriana Lima photographed by Willy Vanderperre for "V" magazine, styling by Oliver Rizzo.
Then i had a crab salad, two shrimps, 10 salmon sashimi, 5 tuna sashimi and 3 maki rolls!
I don’t support it, but I understand it. As always, I stand for individual liberty, even when that liberty allows people to do things that I wish they would rather not.
-Not super shimmery when applied, so don't be afraid for you matte blush lovers
you are thinking are you
-Having a person come up to me and say "you made high school terrible for me"-(wasn't there someone for everyone?)
Carolline
C: MHMMMM
Holloway Transit owner Richard Holloway and his son Jeff Holloway spoke to the County Board of Education about the devices saying “We’re thrilled with them, to be honest with you. We’ve had them on our motor coaches for some years. We’re not fearful of it. I’ve heard a gamut of things from people opposed to it, but by and large it’s been good for us. I like being able to monitor our buses.”
This is what I love about Jen’s classes: she gets you into poses you’ve never done before. Ever hear of bird of paradise? It’s this awesome, twisty, arms linked, leg up thing, and I did it! It wasn’t perfect, but I was pretty impressed with myself, because it was the first time I ever tried to do it. We started off in crescent lunge, then somehow wrapped our arms around one leg, took two steps forward, lifted a leg, and voilà, awesomeness! This is what it looks like when you’ve been doing it forever. I don’t think I looked like this, but I was smiling!
1. What’s your favorite time of day to read?
I’m nearly all set for my trip this month. I’m so excited I can barely contain it! I need a break. A serious break. I’m going away for an entire week, which makes me really happy. Most of my shopping’s done, I have an epic packing list that I’m slowly working on, and I’m finishing up my backlog of photography stuff so I’ll be all set. I’m knocking off things on my to-do list left and right so I can truly relax when we go away because I don’t have to worry about things at home. I’ve exercised so I’ll look good when I go away. I’m learning how to better take care of myself and it’s all paying off. I barely recognize the girl in the mirror anymore. I have a bit of a tan, my hair has looked better lately (loving that I’m growing it out and learning how to take care of it) and my teeth are sparkly white. My clothes not only fit me, but they show off where I look good. I have more confidence because I no longer feel like I’m being walked all over.
It all began innocently enough. I was in the university bookstore, desperate to find a pen that was a) not one I had tried before and b) neither blue nor black. I soon spied a cup of colourful Zebra Z-Grip ballpoints. A little voice inside of me said, "You know, you usually don't like ballpoints that much." "Well, they can't be that bad!" I blithely replied, "I'll take two."
What gives us any reason to believe that our lives have more meaning than theirs? The fairy tales we've invented?
Anyways I'm still in recovery mode...Its amazing how being sick can really reduce you back to the basics. Yesterday was my first day back eating solid food- after each small meal I was so worn out I proceeded to take a one to two hour nap. It was pretty awesome, I'm not going to lie. It was a small glimpse of the beauty that could be my retirement.
For example, in my little chronological chart of metal here, I note 'post-metal, metalcore and other irrelevancies' which is exactly such a statement. I did not mean this as an attack on these sorts of musics, more that regardless of how good such music might be, whatever is metal in it has been so inverted or diluted so as to put the music beyond the scope of this website (though not of my interest in general, I keep up with post-metal due to social fascination). I should not have written that, then, because it diverts interest from the information presented (the chronology) to this guy Helm who doesn't like post-metal. On the most essential level, what bands or styles of metal I like are absolutely irrelevant to what I'm trying to accomplish with this website.
I have long said that the reason skinny girls are in and curvier women are not is fear. Fear of womanliness and all that it means. Flesh, sex, fertility, curves, nature......
Sykes: "Where's the money, Fagin?"
The singer of this song is "stumbling through the rubble" created by a "war no one can win" -- a nuclear war, in other words. She is one of a group of "last rockers" -- dead men walking who rule the world for the time being, but who know that life on earth essentially "perished in atomic heat" when "they dropped their bomb." There's "no chance of a rebirth for the last rockers on earth."
Except for the honey (which is local, from the farmers market) and the yeast, I used all organic ingredients. At only $3.89 for 16 generous burger-sized buns or 24 smaller rolls for sandwiches or just on the side, that is a steal for me. My grocery store's bakery charges $2.69 for 12 cocktail rolls (think what you serve deli meats on at parties), which are not 100% whole wheat and most definitely not made with organic ingredients or the types of ingredients I like to use. They do sell big brand organic breads and buns, but they are always frozen, and they are pushing $6 per package--eeks! Depending on the types of ingredients you use, substitutions and other variables, your cost could be quite low compared to mine even.
I decided to revisit an old favourite of mine. A tweak to the Far Weltered recipe. This is a dark ale using traditional English hops but I've never been quite happy with the balance of the beer. This time I still boiled for 90 minutes to secure the hot break but piled in the hops towards the end of the schedule. I also reduced the IBU's, aiming for a more balanced and fuller bodied finish to the beer. Only time will tell!
It’s pretty clear that, during 2005, Newscorp CEO Rebekah Brooks’s mobile phone must’ve been the most public piece of personal technology on the planet. For as well as her conversations being bugged by the Met Police (they probably wanted to know what was on the menu for dinner that night) A N Other Newscorp title was also hacking her message-box. What a good job it is, then, that Rebekah wasn’t hacking anyone herself; otherwise her phone would’ve had a nervous breakdown at some point.
On this particular Friday night, Bombino’s set got off to an inauspicious start. A voice came over the PA system precisely at 11 pm and began recounting Bombino’s biography. Intentional or not, it sounded like a spoof of the The A-Team. Bombino came on stage after the monologue with an acoustic guitar. He treated the crowd to some beautiful ballads, but it was Friday night and no one was there for nylon strings. By the third tune, you could sense the anxiety in the crowd… “shit, is this an acoustic set?”.
If the IRS doesn’t change its regulations, would the city help the Yankees through additional capital contributions or other subsidies?
potatoes.)
GM: Broad minds rather than fixed policies.
This is such fine stuff that Tennent's advise that you serve it 'ice cold', probably to take away any taste you might be unfortunate enough to experience. Now before we start there's something I have to just have a chuckle at....'Please drink responsibly' on the can! Nice to see the people at Tennent's doing such stirling work with their customer profiling! For all you pedants out there yes I know it's a legal requirement but is anyone naive enough to believe this will ever happen?
1) A panel of judges will choose the winning entries for each age category.
9. Lilies are one of the most popular flowers in the UK, next to the Rose. Globally, Lilies are ranked fourth amount the flowers in popularity.
Pray for the manifestation of healing, signs, wonders, and miracles for God‘s glory: “My speech and my preaching was not with enticing words of man’s wisdom, but in demonstration of the Spirit and of power” (I Corinthians 2:4)
* Flattery towards people who admire and affirm them
It is a fact of life that a man in suburban Australia could walk out of his house at dusk and jog down a bike path, alone, with his headphones on and not have a single concern about his safety.
Naich Restaurant, Atarodi St., Mofatteh St. (Between Shiroudi Sport Complex and Taleghani St.)
Just more shades in the alphabet of colour and my storm,
At the results show, whoever is in the bottom two will have to dance a Cha Cha duel for the judges who will then decide who is going home. I can’t remember a time when the judges have made an elimination decision before – has it ever happened? Who do you think will have to participate in the dance duel? I’m guessing at least one of them will be Gavin. Leave me your two cents!
As the title of this post says, I've got a mixed bag for you today. First, I want to thank everyone for the lovely comments on my last post...they mean so much to me!
The reality is quite different. Local authorities are substantively subservient to the national government, their work is largely dictated by statutory duties and government guidelines and priorities. They are required to provided defined services, at defined levels, following defined policies and procedures (such as 'Best Value'), and the only differences between local authorities deliver these are down to the effectiveness of individual managers and departments.
Police vans also lined the street, lit up by their blue flashing lights, with most shops and takeaways closed and their steel shutters down. A line of officers dispersed the youths and apart from small groups most left the area. Some shouted, "EDL!" as they went.
The Football Association’s appointment of Roy Hodgson as their choice to fill the position of Engla nd manager following Fabio Capello’s resignation was greeted with a mixed reaction by the British media after his unveiling at Wembley on Tuesday afternoon.
In honor of that I am announcing Clear Cut Cards' first contest.
So I've decided to try something out. I'm going to designate one night a week, Monday through Friday, to five different books that I've already begun but have yet to finish. I usually read before I go to sleep at night, so I think this could work.
... does it make sense?"
(Numbers one and two were far and away the things I was MOST grateful for, and, of course, number 7)
Make sure to meet at Lovejoys at 7PM for the annual meeting of the wristbanded. It's the only way to stay on schedule!
4. Baby steps - Break tasks up into smaller chunks that are easier to handle. Like cleaning one room instead of worrying about cleaning the whole house at once. Or like eating just one piece of pizza at a time instead of trying to devour the entire thing at once.
Middle school: Level VI though X,
My fears are bigger than I am. And God's will is not mine, so there is not much comfort there, at all.
One day last week, in the flurry of getting everything and everyone ready, I threw on a pair of amber earrings. I dropped the husband at his bus stop, E at the baby sitter, and jogged to my own bus stop. Once I got on, I realized that one of the two pendants of my earrings had fallen off somewhere along the way. After the initial burn of anger and frustration and shoving the surviving earring into my pocket, I tried to remind myself that it was just a thing, and that I shouldn't feel so bad about losing it. (And really, that if I had just been on time like an adult I could have walked to the bus stop in quiet poise like the rest of the grown ups.) But it was hard to shake my sadness because those earrings were very special to me. They were sterling silver and dark green amber, and they were the first piece of jewelry I can remember buying for myself. I was around 18 and they were expensive to me at the time (almost $40!) but I loved them for how substantial and glamorous they felt to me at the time. (I never wore earrings in general, let alone dangly ones. The first time I wore them to his house, my now-husband asked me if I was wearing makeup.)
Cork City18/5 (Bwin); Draw23/10 (William Hill); Shamrock Rovers 10/11(Boylesports)
I am going to have to find a way to be able to write without being overwhelmed by the urge to smoke. Masturbation eases the urge, but makes it harder to type. Hopefully as I go longer without smoking, I’ll be able to write on a regular basis.
In retrospect I started out too hard. My heart rate monitor was not working and without it to keep me in line I let myself go a little too hard too early. These days I only wear it while racing and failed to check if it was in working order. Second, this was my last 100 for the year but another sub-par performance at the distance. San Diego in June was also a bit of a disappointment time wise. It seems like my departure from triathlon has hurt rather than enhance my running. More miles has not made me faster and I think cross training or the lack of lies in the heart of all this. One great thing about triathlon training was all the biking and spin classes I was doing. Anyway something to think about as I wind down my season and look forward to 2011. I've got two short ultras and a ton of volunteering to finish off the year.
“The difference between violence and non-violence resides in the heart.”
3/4 cup (3 ounces) grated Parmigiano-Reggiano cheese
Forget the humble nut cracker. I love that in Malaysia you get a little hammer to crack open your crab.
For quite a while now
Without further ado the winner is...did I mention how hard it was for us to pick a winner? Well, we did, and it's...
To follow him.
I also made a few adjustments from the original recipe. I didn't have some of the ingredients, so I had to make do a bit. Still tasted awesome. So whether you decide to stick with the original recipe or go with my (let's admit it, cheaper) adjustments, you're definitely in for a treat.
Why did I take the time to write this? Dude, it beats masturbating. I don’t know.
That night he was shaken to hear his son's teachers and teachers aides verbally abuse and humiliate the boy. From the moment he walked off the school bus they shouted at him in rough voices: "Put your hands down! You gotta walk with your eyes open!"
To try and bring some order to the chaos I’ll go through the different Goldings clones in the National Hop Collection chronologically as shown in a picture on Stan Hieronymus’s blog, followed by a brief note on locality.
I think that part of the value is the ability to get up a head of steam and keep going and let it flow out of you.
Childrens' clothes and coats (always in short supply, and cheaper to mail than adult clothes)
After checking into a nearby hotel for £1.80 a night we got some tasty and cheap food then headed to bed early to be refreshed for the morning.
Elsa: Emma Vetter
I’ve picked my buy-in levels based on backtesting to try and maximize my leverage of the volatility in gold. Shorts were a loser in this market because it defiantly refused to correct, so for right now I’m long only.
i plan to look back so that i never forget the little things.
I find matter for serious attention in Ezra Pound’s discordant shrieking….
Bloody Sunday: A British soldier drags a Catholic protester during the killings on January 30, 1972. Paratroopers shot dead 14 Catholic civil rights marchers in Londonderry
okay I will stop talking.. I get carried away... haha
Okay, so I was a hairy kid. I mean, like my legs were sprouting forests when I was in the fourth grade. And I have super dark hair, so that didn't help anything.
Hot weather only adds to the fun and enjoyment of Shark Attack Margarita's, so I can see myself buying lots of them this summer.
Step one.
As you might expect, the Redmond-based company have an already-perfected public reason for why they have taken this route, claiming on the Windows 8 blog that they believe that DVD usage on personal computers is on a sharp decline, and significant royalties would need to be spent in order to bring users native support for any optical media. Microsoft might be correct about the declining use of DVDs on personal computers due to the ongoing focus on online media, however, I am sure users will feel that such a simple feature should be bundled as standard, and for free.
universities and hospitals
Now, for those of you who have no idea what I'm talking about... Cast your memory back (if you are of a similar vintage) to around 1992-1994 and a little show on the ABC called 'Vidiot' - a childrens trivia show (yeah... I was a slow developer... especially considering I was 15-17 years old). Eden was the host... and a bit of spunk to boot.
As the day gets long, and the journey gets painful,
The Public Interest
One of my favorite moments is when the sad bookish man asks our protagonist “Do you believe that man is worthy of being saved?” And our protagonist answers quietly and firmly, “Yes”.
Of course the systems will also be physically rig tested in back to back comparisons with their mechanical counterparts on the teams multi-post rigs.
Not too surprisingly, Shine’s decision to air this inchoate, amorphous show was not universally well received. To wit, Inside Cable News was not the least bit impressed. Rather, blogger Spud scoffed, “This is probably the most uninspiring offering FNC has put on the air….FNC is apparently out of new ideas and unsure of a future course of action regarding 5pm.” He acerbically added, “Nobody involved in this project should feel too secure about its future when the press release announcing it spells out that it has a short shelf life: This is FNC in a rare public manifestation of scramble mode…coming up with something to fill the space without regard to the suitability of that kind of programming at that time of day.
They all laughed and the whiner said, “Well, tomorrow, my boyfriend would get me another one. You girls know now…it’s already on its way from Dubai” I switched off then…
2 Kings 23:3 Next, the king stood by the pillar and made a covenant in the presence of the LORD to follow the LORD and to keep His commands, His decrees, and His statutes with all his mind and with all his heart, and to carry out the words of this covenant that were written in this book; all the people agreed to the covenant.
has anyone told you that Amazon has your book listed as written by "Meehan and Dawn" ?? did you co-write your own book with yourself??!
This untidiness makes me so angry that I actually went around the house one time, when everyone was away and took pictures of everything!!! From stains on the floor as to a Yu-Gi-Yoh cards lying forgotten in the corner. After taking the pictures I made a PowerPoint, full of embarrassing pictures of their room and bathroom. I added some dramatic music and a couple of threats:- “Beware if you don’t start cleaning up after yourselves, I will post this to You Tube and Facebook and tag your names into it”.
“She” was, thin and blond and she had her front door open and the glass storm door closed. Who does that at night AND with the lights on? Sure, I have done it but I have threatened my husbands life if he turns a light on.
That you can’t rinse away
We men – love make outs.
When I was 10 years old, we moved back to the San Francisco Bay Area where I was born. It was February, and we exited blizzard conditions in Colorado and entered what I thought was Eden on earth with sunny balmy days and frost-free nights. Daffodils were in bloom, almond trees were laden with pale pink blossoms, and the thrill of spring was in the air.
As the app will be published on Google Play all the necessary technical and legal precautions will be made during the production process. Access to unique software called the App Designer as well as previously acquired graphical capabilities will ensure appropriate production.
It has been cloudy all day and quite a little colder. It was 39º above at noon.
The ban on work wear is a peculiar one considering another sign advertises the place is ideal for business lunches. My work wear is a suit. Do they wish me to take that off if I go for a “business lunch”? Am I offended by the presence of a working man in overalls stood at the bar having a pint after work? Not at all, and I wouldn’t expect him to be offended by the sight of me in my cheap suit. The only people that offend me in pubs are bearded types telling me the pongy ale “is drinking well” when what I want is to sink an ice cold pint of fizz.
*Breaking News! Tara has since commented on my last post, too. Sure, it was just to join in on the social hour, but I'll take it.*
We've been advised that the boffins are working hard to solve the problem (all I could suggest was switching it off and then switching it back on again, but I think they tried that one last Tuesday).
As I am working to grow in Christ I encourage others to do the same. Growing up in God is much different from growing up in the world. When the world is inconsistent with explaining what the future will bring the Word of God gives specific and truthful breakdowns. God will mercifully remove all crutches so that we may reach our full potential as the Body of Christ. Rest assured that growing up spiritually in Christ is one of the most rewarding experiences in Christ if not the most rewarding. Maturing in Christ brings so much joy, power, and authority. In spiritual development other aspects of our lives are affected and will ultimately be a reflection of our ever-increasing relationship with our Father. Leave your childish ways behind and press on toward the goal to win the prize of which God has called us heavenward in Christ Jesus (Philippians 3:14). Thank You Jesus.
Jay and E have the same behavior therapist, who comes to the house once a week. I won't lie; I look forward to her visits more than they do! I know that she feels at home here when I see her jump up to wipe up a spill or help dish up dinner for the kids.
No, I am not proud - because Israel has given in to his blackmail and has agreed to release him after his being on a hunger strike for 60 days. His complaint is about how he has been treated by Israel and much of the world has joined forces to condemn Israel.
4-5 tbsp sugar
Ah, bureaucracy.
GPs, carers and disability groups were invited to have a look around the mobile dental trailer and see how Southern Health services can be used to benefit those who may not normally be able to access dental care.
Before I show you some of the the back and inside photos, I wanted to share some sweet details with you about Shaklee’s Headquarters and what was used to make it:
I also do not generally do paintings of famous buildings. Here it was the arrangement of light and dark shapes in the scene which I found exciting. The Capitol was not the strongest contrast in the scene so in theory might not be the center of interest...but when something as iconic as the US Capitol works its way into your painting, it is hard not to make it the center of interest.
Did I love well?
“For sure, these people are going to sell the laptops or let them gather dust in a corner of the room.
Day/FULL HOURS full distance on French Riviera Cannes Saint Tropez Monaco Nice airport
Sunday night he was the other person. The angry person. The person that hates me and sees me as the enemy. The person who radiates hatred and a desire to destroy. The person who is looking for war. For blood.
I mean, yes, work is very busy. I've been working the same hours as usual, but they seem to be very exhausting hours that require a lot of energy and concentration. But, I've always had a demanding job.
At the beginning of the book Meg was just your average outcast. She purposely didn’t have friends, her dad wasn’t very nice, and she was extremely snarky. But as the book went on I got to see beneath that hard exterior and see the damaged, scared girl beneath. Seeing who she truly was really helped me empathize with her.
05 - Gator Country 06:16
So does this mean that even if us bloggers stick to the indie and unsigned artists, and post everything with full permission, that sometime in the future some bastard is coming to come crashing down on us because in the past we've had the temerity to write about and post songs from an artist that they have gone on to sign? Does that mean that nothing is safe? Surely one of the sources of information that major labels use to find out about new bands is blogs. That's just having your cake and eating it.
Putting trust in ourself opens up SO much! Reflecting upon the risks of creating the flyer. It could have sucked. And I am okay with that. Either way it gave me the opportunity to expand and grow!
Life in San Francisco is pretty much completely hassle-free. I have a friend who described living here as 'being able to do whatever you want, whenever you want to do it' (like sit in a tree for 21 months). Because of this aspect, I've been able to open a dance studio and shoe store here. This is something I don't think would have been possible had I stayed in NYC. The rents there are too high and the hoops you need to jump through to get a lease are just crazy. Here, we have our own stable business (where we can do whatever we want, whenever we want to do it), it's just a block from where we live so it's insanely convenient, and I have everything I need right here within walking distance. I am able to keep a car here, so I have the freedom that provides.
“Then the princes of the Philistines said, “What are these Hebrews doing here?” 1 Samuel 29:3
The Resistance
The Children's Trust, based in Tadworth, is a national charity providing care, education and therapy for children with multiple disabilities and complex health needs, and rehabilitation services to children with an acquired brain injury. The Trust runs the UK's largest residential rehabilitation centre for paediatric acquired brain injury and has an on-site special school, The School for Profound Education (formerly St Margaret's), which publishes The Profound Education Curriculum for children and young people with profound and multiple learning difficulties (PMLD).
You see the same misshapen logic deployed in other arenas dominated by prosecutors, as with the Todd Willingham case at the Forensic Science Commission. The trial testimony about fire and arson was all hokum, it was the only directly inculpatory evidence presented to the jury, but Williamson County DA John Bradley insisted that just because there's no evidence of arson doesn't mean it couldn't have happened. Problem is, the jury wasn't told it "could" have happened; they were told the "fire doesn't lie." This is the precedential ghost of Roy Criner's case, further evidence that Sharon Keller's consistent if often invisible hand is still guiding the state down the same dark path that left the court humiliated in Criner and a national laughingstock. Rather than learn from the experience, Keller and Co. and the hard-line prosecutors whose interests they represent chose to double down and do everything in their power to prevent future science-based exonerations, culminating in the Willingham fiasco and Ex Parte Robbins.
In a large pot, boil water. Once boiling, add dry pasta and cook to al dente.
When I was seventeen, my mother figured out that I was living with an eating disorder. I don’t say suffering, I don’t say struggling, I don’t say battling. I was living with it. I ate. I threw up. I hovered over the fridge at 3am and engulfed everything in sight only to vomit it in a toilet five minutes later. I’d gotten so good at it, I evolved from using my fingers to just thinking about it.
At Health Care Concierge’s we applaud, thank, and appreciate all caregivers! Their love and devotion of their career is one of life’s highest and most unique gifts or special talent to give to others.
thought it was one of the dogs
Everyone smiles in the same language. ~Author Unknown
Dear Sister:
Have a wonderful day! :)
Chickweed is the most common of plants growing in all corners of the world. It is a lovely green plant which hugs the ground and has many small, heart shaped leaves.
There'll be a few other changes happening soon too...we do like to keep you on your toes! lol
Setting triangles and cables after being washed
"By contrast, some shows with low early levels of online buzz, including CBS's comedy "2 Broke Girls" and its mystery series "Unforgettable," ranked highest in viewership."There is no indication that this finding holds true outside the TV industry. But why shouldn't it?
PO Kris Aquino: No, this impeachment court should thank the prosecution panel. Your terno-driven manifestation was brilliant, promise. I’m sure matutuwa si Noy. So, thank you. And with that, trial adjourned!
That's all for now!
I want to enter these challenges with my card:
Zak is talking so much now. He puts 2 words together a lot. He loves to act out what he wants as well. Too cute! Hope has really come along with her English. I say it is like having a little Yoda in the house. She talks in reverse which I find so endearing. We get a new story almost everyday now about Ethiopia. Things will remind her of her home country and things that happened there. I love having some pieces of her puzzle. She is very loving and happy girl! She runs up to me on her own now and gives me hugs and says "I love you so very much mommy!"
I see my students also utilizing their iPad technology to blog about their reactions, participate in back channel discussion about what they are observing or participating in and sharing audio/visual artifacts with their peers in the XBox Live Avatar Kinect.
I am firm with each, the pangs are sharp yet unavoidable,
Firstly, they are idols. According to dictionary.reference.com idol refers to:
While I was enjoying the chronicles of Scarlett O’Hara, I also noticed that Mitchell was doing something with the “Come Late, Leave Early” technique that I’d never seen done before.
Patsy: Keep driving, Eddy. You haven't hit anything yet.
As we were preparing to go down to the Kennedy Center, I noticed that episode 36 of the WWPD podcast was out and available and I had a "brilliant" idea. I could download the episode, and listen to it with one ear bud in my left ear as my wife sits on my right side. It was a good plan - I even went and found my set of ear buds that are black to reduce the chance of being seen in the dark theater. Oh I was being very crafty that night. In fact, I even came up with a mission name - Operational Audio Escape.
All the best for you and have a great time!
From Option 1 to Option 3 and Back Again
The cat cannot change his spots!
“I’m dyin’, Sid,” Johnny moaned but Sid just shrugged his shoulders and shook his head from side to side.
Graduates for a Digital Age
Chang is accused of six more similar charges of procuring women, all believed to be Singaporeans, at Bugis Junction, Suntec City, Loyang and Ang Mo Kio in 2010.
His announcement comes as Arab leaders at a regional summit in Iraq’s capital today endorsed a UN-backed peace plan for Syria which they said should be implemented ‘immediately and completely’.
Who matters,
FB: Oui, oui, like that theeng...
I would change my speech,
We made two holiday trips back to DC
bottle’s? Is that what Rilke meant
Image 3: Earth mother Gaia.
1 1/2 cups chicken broth
Hatch MC, Shu XO, McLean DE, Levin B, Begg M, Reauss L, et al. Maternal exercise during pregnancy, physical fitness and fetal growth. Am J Epidemiol 1993; 1105-1114.
There was no justifying the cappy shoulders. I haven’t got a cappy. I didn’t even go and half-heartedly roll one to try and give myself an excuse. I just sat, and I agonized for about a minute, and then I dumped the last of my sad little pile of medallions onto a pair of heavy shoulders, which will now sit in Llythne’s vault (along with the Warden chest piece from Helegrod, my last piece of “omg HAVE TO HAVE IT” cross-class armour), and be a reminder of the fact that I am not a responsible person.
are riddled with mistakes. "It drove me nuts, because I tried really hard to get things right and I just couldn't. It's exhausting, and hard to do. And it starts to wear on you emotionally. I know that sounds weird and whiny, but it's true."
GC: Did you know anything about Hancock or the Civil War before the movie?
15. Arizona Gallery of Sky Pictures
They make it across the border and to the bar where they are to meet their contact. It is when the sun goes down the movie transforms from a crime to action/horror film. The bart is a haven for vampires. Everyone is forced to battle the bloodsuckers until sunlight can seep through the numerous bullet holes left by the gunfire in the morning. By then, only Seth and kate are left alive.
Gregory: the debt!
In Jesus name we play,
Almond oil was also used in lamps for ceremonially purposes. The Old Testament Tabernacle used a Gold Lamp-stand. Under Gods instructions the almond was used in designing the lamp, Leviticus 24: 3-4.
Hi everyone and welcome to October and our first challenge of the month.
Flash forward to yesterday. I'd been sewing binding on the six quilts that have come back from the longarm quilter, and thinking about this project. So, once all the quilts had binding around them, I got out the book and the squares and got ready to sew.
I like the picture above. It shows a Roman Catholic nun, throwing a snow ball at another Roman Catholic nun. I think that pictures capture the idea I wish to convey of Roman Catholic’s argument being self-defeating (or self- “owning” if you will).
The article, while offering much praise for Yormark’s hard work, salesmanship, and innovations, also addresses the challenges presented in the headline.
So I’ve been wondering, when people are talking with me, am I a safe person? Am I comfortable enough in my own skin and with my own emotional health to invite others to be as real as they choose, to express whatever they feel with no fear of rejection or shame? Am I a good enough conversationalist that I can lead and/or follow people to talk about things that are important enough, where we get beyond just the head and maybe, just maybe, delve into the arena of the heart?
Grilled Bronzino (Seabass) Served With
I would love to hear any feedback or comments you may have.
If someone did take every single post and every single photo of every single design, that book would look like garbage, and probably read like it too.
We had it timed perfectly where I would graduate from college, then have 8 months to stay home with you before I would start teaching.
I have been abroad. I've been to England for a class in college. At my school, everyone had to take a senior seminar. Basically a culminating course usually having to do with some sort of religious aspect. I decided to take my senior seminar abroad. It was called "The Sacred and the Profane" and focused on the relationship between traditional English church and folk music. We went to London, Cambridge, Stratford, Dover... (I'm totally forgetting all the places we went) I even got a semi-private tour of some Napoleonic caves/forts built into the Dover cliffs. All of it was amazing, but my absolute favorite place we went was Cambridge. I loved the college town atmosphere, the farmers market, the buildings, the fact that everyone rode bikes (except for the presence and subsequent arrest of a guy who went around stabbing people on bikes while we were there). It was the coolest place. If I were to go back to anywhere in England, it would be there.
James Hallawell (keyboards)
I don’t know what’s going on in other states, but this election season in Georgia is getting pretty scary. Here’s what we’ve learned lately from television ads about our two candidates for governor:
you did not think to enquire,
Pablo Picasso: 'Woman with a cat sitting in a chair,' priced to sell for $15 million, sold for $18 million at Christie's.
before its
to the bottom and the smoke swirls inside...
For one thing, many of the Wake Up books have Amazon sales rankings of 1 million and higher...not really what you'd expect for a series touted on its covers as "Best-Selling." For another, there's a peculiar proliferation of websites for the series. In addition to the one I've already mentioned, there's this one, this one, this one, and this one, all with similar URLs, and also this one, which appears to be an earlier version. These websites seem less oriented to finding readers than to soliciting writers, in language distressingly reminiscent of late-night infomercials. "For the first time ever you can get the Insider Secrets of How to Get Fame and Fortune as a Published Author!" one of the websites exclaims. According to another, "With Wake Up Live's Team Publishing Concept, you can achieve the ultimate credential that will propel your life and business to new heights by being a best selling co-author in this amazing program!" Enthuses yet another, "Wouldn’t it be great to get Instant Credibility™ with your clients and customers as a co-author?"
1) There is National Health Service which is absolutely free for emergencies should you have the misfortune to need it. The hospitals are top class, matching and exceeding private health care in ZA. Most wards will not only provide top notch medical attention, but also frills such as TV and Internet access at your bedside. The NHS is also pretty good for other day to day medical cares.
“The scars inside are deeper than the ones on my body. The wounds are still in process of healing. I put up a fight when they tried to get their filthy hands on me. When a man turns into an animal there is no limit to what he will do. May they be forgiven for what they have perpetrated, she mumbled softly.
light illuming every light
Poor Winston will have to excuse me but never in the American history have so few suffered the mental and physical injuries for so many who while being all for fighting the latest evil horde out to destroy the republic and defile our woman just never found the local recruiting office themselves.
When Sarina and I arrived at Marshalls department store tonight and stood on line to return something, there was a bit of a commotion going on at the front registers. A little Spanish girl, 2 1/2, maybe 3 years old, was standing among the customers on line and she was shaking a little bottle of soda. She had a big grin on her face. The cashiers were trying to get her to stop, warning her that if she opened that cap, it was going to explode everywhere. They asked her where her mommy was.
Step on my heart with their feet,
Where do you get your inspiration or your motivation?
It will be bottled this week, and should be in the cold cases on Friday, March 9. It will be in Epic's standard 22-ounce bottle will cost $5.89.
I must admit I was a little concerned being on the 5th floor of a very old building at home”.
While he's in town, Eric will be part of a cool event at Julian tomorrow evening, doing an interactive blending of some New Belgium beers! If you'd like more info, or want to reserve your spot, email
I learned that the way each of us chooses to live has a very real effect on other people. I guess that is true in many different ways. What I was thinking of when I said that was things like water usage, buying clothes made by genetically modified cotton, using more than you need to, and how those things can hurt people in the third world. However, I guess that's also true in the sense that the kind of person you choose to be (i.e. not a meanie) can really impact people. Blah, blah, blah. Lead by example.
One may ask, How can something be inside and outside at the same time? Parīkṣit therefore names a prominent Vedic deity: Vāyu, god of the sky. Everything in our world is within the sky, but that does not mean that the sky is limited and contained within everything. The sky is distinct from and greater than everything within it! Similarly All-Attractive Hari is the soul within everyone and everything, yet is an individual person as well, greater than and distinct from everyone else.
Had some fun layering and playing around on this layout! I am really happy with the way it turned out....I had to add in a banner, of course :), but I tried to kinda change it up a little.
Taxi Dancing
312-251-9929
I got such a huge library haul this week because my boyfriend works 15 hour days now, from Monday through Saturday, and there's no time to get to the library. So I figured I'd grab a huge stack and wait it out til the next time he has a weekday off.
12 3 to 4 inch long pickling cucumbers
There are many rules for comma usage, the main ones being to use a comma between all terms in a series, before the conjunction when joining independent clauses, and to set off parenthetical remarks. I do not need to give you examples; you probably know more about commas than I do. But despite all the rules that have been formulated for commas, there is one overriding rule: use a comma to prevent confusion.
This is touching and humorous and makes us love Hal all the more.
Bernadette Soubirous was born in 1844, the first child of an extremely poor miller in the town of Lourdes in southern France. The family was living in the basement of a dilapidated building when on February 11,1858, the Blessed Virgin Mary appeared to Bernadette in a cave above the banks of the Gave River near Lourdes. Bernadette, 14 years old, was known as a virtuous girl though a dull student who had not even made her first Holy Communion. In poor health, she had suffered from asthma from an early age.
I died in his arms that night.
1/4 cup freshly grated Parmesan cheese
Sure. A character has a Glock bulging in their pocket and a clue is revealed. You're compelled to turn the next page and find out what it is.Learn more about the book and author at Cara Black's website.
There were on only about 6 plants this time-
It wasn’t long before Alice had to slow down. Her lungs could not keep up with her will, and battery acid was flowing through her veins as her heart begged for a chance to catch up. As she stood, her head hung, panting, she heard it. Breathing, breathing that quickened with excitement. A rasping, moaning wheeze of a breath and a sniffing, a deep smelling of the air, of her scent.
Will the movie live up to the book? Maybe, maybe not. The important thing is - the book still lives.
"For First Lady Michelle Obama, healthy eating is not just a way of life, it's a mission, and front and center is the man in her own kitchen," Dawes says as she introduces Kass in the video, with a montage of photos from the Let's Move! campaign. Kass explains the First Lady's approach to eating, stressing that Mrs. Obama is not advocating dieting, and no foods are forbidden.
- I was very glad to see how prominent organics continue to be, and glad that there are so many companies offering them. Even names synonymous with chemistry, like Scott's and Bayer, are offering their own lines of organics.
And stay tuned...a new website is in the works and some of The Pearl Girls™ will be guest blogging.
The father, Ahmed Abuhamda, denies any wrongdoing, saying he followed the couple’s divorce decree when he moved the children from the Kansas City suburb of Overland Park to the Middle East in February.
But this does not invalidate what Harry Hughes and Chris Drake have said regarding J.T. Ready. Neither one absolutely ruled out the possibility that Ready was the shooter; they merely opined that it seemed improbable. The record clearly shows that J.T. Ready would give a comrade the shirt off his back if necessary to perpetrate the Cause, and that he would stop to aid a motorist in distress. And to dismiss J.T. Ready as nothing more than a "vainglorious attention whore" would not only be disrespectful of his activism, but inaccurate; "attention whores" do not suit up in full combat gear and go patrolling in the desert in 100F degree heat. J.T. Ready was clearly a patriot -- albeit a flawed patriot.
for the work.”
Our guide then takes us on a walking tour. This was my absolute highlight. It turned out that Interm President Zuma of the ANC was coming to speak that afternoon. The streets teemed with people dancing and screaming. They proudly held out ANC flags and wore shorts adorned with Zumas face. As we walked through the chaos we remarked at the amazing experience we were having. Encircled by poverty we were welcomed by these people who posed for pictures (and even asked for them to be taken!), shook our hands and just seemed so genuine. There is no possible way for me to accurately describe the experience but it was just SO real and SO neat. These people are very political and even amongst poverty, AIDs and illiteracy, they manage to get so excited and involved. Unfortunately we had heard (and there is no way for me to verify this, so its not fact necessarily), that Zuma is actually quite corrupt and that a lot of Black Africans vote for the ANC because it was Mandelas party, but is not currently very good for the Black community.
At the time of the law's creation in 1986, Congress said they were committed to setting up a fair, expedited, non-adversarial, less traumatic, less expensive no-fault compensation mechanism alternative to civil litigation. But Congress also acknowledged that any legislation providing liability protection must also be equally committed to preventing vaccine harm. The Act contains strong safety provisions, including first-time mandates for doctors to record and report serious health problems, hospitalizations, injuries and deaths after vaccination and give parents written benefit and risk information before a child is vaccinated.
After long and drawn out negotiations with the Kim Ayres - The Bearded Scotsman, who I don’t think actually is Scottish, I have agreed not to post comments on his site in return for him creating a button that you can place on your own site, much like the Maroon Awards he created for Dr M.
1 C all-purpose flour
Rick and I celebrated our 12th anniversary July 24th with an evening/night alone.
And one young man wrote, and this is a direct quote, “I think about the garden project as a model for being gentle: gentle with nature, gentle to your body, and gentle with each other. Now we need to remember and follow that model.” Isn’t that beautiful? (Applause.)
Baby let me do wanna wanna do
Cover Thoughts: I love it!
Today’s advancements include:
We have an upcoming birthday celebration. We will be celebrating our first blogoversary soon. This means a big giveaway event with many books. More information to come on this at a later date.
Yes some who knew the truth.
I hope this helps you expand your pantry no matter how small it looks!
In the third stage, the question to be answered is whether there is any teaching in the prior art as a whole that would (not simply could, but would) have prompted the skilled person, faced with the objective technical problem, to modify or adapt the closest prior art while taking account of that teaching, thereby arriving at something falling within the terms of the claims, and thus achieving what the invention achieves. According to Dr. Maiwald,
new christmas books. a dvd for the thanksgiving car ride to virginia.
Which makes Mags tired! So tired.
Middaugh D, Hester C. Managing the pregnant employee. Medsurg Nurs 2006; 15: 238-240.
Rule with a nod:
Unless I’m in church.
There is a reason for all the different sized needles. if you're using a sewing machine, make sure you have the proper needle for your fabric, especially if your fabric is really heavy or light. If you're hand sewing, the needles are different sizes for functionality. If you buy a pack of hand needles, they usually say what the different needles are for on the back of the package.
Tax increases.
Flavour wise; you’ve got what was hinted at in the aroma and more. The alcohol is noticeable, but is offset by the cherry, strawberry and raisin/sweet malt flavours. These are followed by a quite severe tartness-apparently due to lactobacterial fermentation, which carries through to the finish.
most and wanted so much for Christmas. She was
While I was at the nursery I'm afraid I didn't stop at just buying a couple of bags of mulch. I couldn't resist picking up just a couple more little plants to add to one of the rock garden sections of the driveway garden that I've been working so hard on lately. It was only a few little babies, and so necessary to fill in some empty spots!!!! Sounds good doesn't it?
I decided to quilt the long applique borders using a curved cross hatch. That might not be the best way to use the curves. It turns into rainbows over long areas. I drew it out on my quilt and then started quilting from there. Then I came up with the rainbow. Then I drew some more. Then I ripped. I decided maybe I'd better practice on paper and see what I could come up with.
- Our CORRECTED home study arrived in the mail!
who is the very embodiment
(2) become a follower
Yogurt is such a good healthy side for the lunch box and adding fresh fruit is not the only possible healthy addition.
Spencer is giving a little girl a makeover. It’s Extreme Makeover: Kid Edition.
You see, the astronomical price of gasoline in America is a symptom of the problem, and not the bigger problem.
Those of you who have kids at home should use this as a teaching moment and explain to them the dangers of hanging around and acting like this. It may seem cool to them but leads to a dead end life or death.
You get the drift.
We rely on others to make it alright for us – “How could he accept that second cup of tea I offered – didn’t he know I was tired?”
The following anecdote shows how the above statement became clear as I was trying to cross the chasm that appeared and how it was possible to build a bridge over that across the Continents.
The 12" test pressing goes to:
I don’t think it’s my fucking job to edit my facebook so no one ever feels discomfort or disagreement when reading my facebook posts. Why do I feel that way, you might ask? Why don’t I want to just be a nice person? Why am I always so cross, always swearing so much? Surely it wouldn’t hurt to be a little diplomatic about things, to sweeten my words a bit here and there and tone it down just a touch, right? Don’t need to be quite so bitchy and swear like a sailor all the time, do we now?
people of the state of
Designed by Gallery experts to facilitate learning, enrichment, enjoyment, and exploration, NGA Images features more than 20,000 open access digital images, up to 3,000 pixels each, available free of charge for download and use.
Thing is, each cities fans will react differently when they win. In 2004, Red Sox fans cried and cheered after they won the world series. In 2002 Ohio State fans rioted after they beat Michigan in a regular season football game. Every time the Yankees win, their fans cheer, scream and enjoy another victory. The world watches what we do when our team wins and every city is different. Moment your city turns to rioting, fires, tear gas, etc. all the happy moments and good people are erased by the ugliness of your bad seeds.
Eva, over at Untrodden Paths, has passed on the Versatile Blog award to my blog and several others. I'm rather touched as I find Eva very inspiring and her blog motivates me to try all sorts of different things. Apparently I need to share seven things you might not know about me and pass the award on to fifteen other blogs... I'll do my best with the blogs but here are seven things you might not know about me:
For this hop we have 7 different prize draws! We have not one but TWO grand prize draws, so two lucky hoppers will win a large selection of new release stamps. Grand Prize 1 will be for those who help us advertise the hop, and Grand Prize 2 will be for those who hop along with us. We also have 5 mini candy stops throughout the hop where you can enter to win a new release stamp! I'm not going to tell you where all of them are, but I will say that one of the mini candy stops is right here!! So if you want a chance to win Bart Goes Golfing and Hang In There in deeply etched red rubber, scroll down to the bottom of this post and add your name using the Inlinkz option! Here are the two rubber images Denise will be mailing to one lucky winner who enters the draw using the inlinkz option below:
Now, I thought the movie was pretty impressive, especially the fact the director M. Night Shyamalan crammed a whole book into 2 hours. The movie was pretty violent too. But, whenever they would get ready to shoot a move, it would take about 8 seconds to pose their move and then attack. The only fast moves were the Fire attacks. But, earth, water and air was pretty slow. I was starting to wonder how come the Fire benders couldn’t attack while the other benders were taking time to pose. Lol. But, I would understand why they would have that minor difficulty. It’s really hard to show bending effects in real life. Another thing, Zuko looked like a Indians. And so did the other Fire benders. I really hated the fact they were all Indians. Zuko was actually supposed to be Japanese. What the heck? I really disliked the fact they put race-bending in the movie too. Than, at the end they said in prediction they would make a new Avatar about book 2. I was really pissed off about that. I’ve already seen all books. You expect me to see the movie 3 times and spend money too? That’s like the stupidest thing they could’ve come up with. But, my mom was going with it.
Upon completion of the deal, slated for Sept 9, 2011, Sime Darby will be the single largest shareholder of E&O.
3. Don’t make the world worse. I know that I’m supposed to tell you to aspire to great things. But I’m going to lower the bar here: Just don’t use your prodigious talents to mess things up. Too many smart people are doing that already. And if you really want to cause social mayhem, it helps to have an Ivy League degree. You are smart and motivated and creative. Everyone will tell you that you can change the world. They are right, but remember that “changing the world” also can include things like skirting financial regulations and selling unhealthy foods to increasingly obese children. I am not asking you to cure cancer. I am just asking you not to spread it.
The Duke of Westminster has announced that he is going to donate a country estate as a care home for returning wounded soldiers. This is the greatest act of benevolence that I am aware of in my lifetime and certainly the type of act that I thought had been consigned to the history books. On this occasion I am delighted to be wrong and commend the Good Duke accordingly.
"ARE YOU HAPPY To SEE ME?
As I crossed the road and turned the corner, there sat a car that was not supposed to be there. I immediately recognized it as a car that should have been passing me about 30 minutes later from this time. I didn’t realize that someone was in the car until I walked by. Thanks to the crazy kid driver in the truck, I was not forced to walk directly by the car, I was on the other side of the road. When I realized someone was in the car and it was parked behind some piles of dirt, things started feeling weird to me. All the hairs on my neck started standing up and I knew that something was not right with the situation. I immediately pulled out my cell phone and called me sister who lived across the street from me. My husband was at work and I needed someone quick. While not letting this guy know I suspected anything, I kept walking in the same direction. He pulled out and turned the corner only to turn around and come back up the street behind me.
We went to lunch. But we didn't go where we normally would go. She chose instead at a quiet bistro with a private table. We had two martinis each and I enjoyed the meal tremendously.
Of course, I never thought to question: my mother was telling me these things, and she wouldn't steer me wrong, right? RIGHT? So, essentially, for the first eighteen years of my life, I lived in fear of the imminent return to life of a sanctified demigod and the subsequent culling of souls that he would harvest in the wake of his trumpet blasts.
The US Border Guard was registered with the Arizona Secretary of State as a search and rescue organization. Most members obtained NASAR certifications. The USBG is not in any way, shape or form a white supremacist militia. The USBG was open to everyone regardless of race, religion, political affiliations or even disabilities.
As for the massive amounts of vitamins or prescriptions that we need to keep out of kids reach, I found an old colorful card box, removed the lid, and now it's an uber cute vitamin holding box instead:
Overall it was a fun trip. I had a few great dances, most of the others were at least good, none were bad. We got to know M and E a bit more and they are awesome (and their apartment is gorgeous, Deb has a serious case of apartment envy). We met some fun people, socialized and spent a little time in Montreal, a city we really like.
But let's just deal with that £414 billion. Imagine what could be done with it. Imagine how it could be used to make sure that we developed the very best sustainable energy sources, let's say. Or how it could be used to ensure that we had the best medical service we could possibly imagine. Or that it could be ploughed into investing in people's training, education, and development of skills and ideas. Or that it was channeled into solving the problems of housing for all.
The wheels are falling off the Man Made Global Warming bandwagon. Mr Gore and his cronies might wish to look at what a very wise man wrote all those years ago..
actions. I’m tired of hearing them blame the government, or discrimination
Also, apparently, petard is derived from the French word for breaking wind. So I guess, this means that my SWRS is a means of exploding myself with my own fart.
MMS has since admitted that up to 400 exploration projects in the Gulf have been granted categorical exclusions!
Online business success requires similar amount of attention, focus and investment of money and times as does other businesses in the outer world.
We certainly hope that is not the case. In fact, “Fair Game,” based on books by Mr. Wilson and his wife, is full of distortions – not to mention outright inventions. To start with the most sensational: The movie portrays Ms. Plame as having cultivated a group of Iraqi scientists and arranged for them to leave the country, and it suggests that once her cover was blown, the operation was aborted and the scientists were abandoned. This is simply false. In reality, as The Post’s Walter Pincus and Richard Leiby reported, Ms. Plame did not work directly on the program, and it was not shut down because of her identification. [Translation - she made it up - Editor]
LABOUR: Pasty pasty pasty. Current government pasty pasty pies. Ambient temperature. Pasty pasty. Pasty pasty pasties pies cool down pasty pasty pies sausage rolls ambient temperature. I love pasties.
Then HGTV is looking for you!
It is the one that has led me to the place I am now. That place where the smile is genuine, the joy is real. And the love I feel for myself is warm.
1. The total of unique users is more volatile
“Jericho” has had one heck of a history. It was canned after one season. Except, the shows fans wouldn’t let it die. So it came back for a second season, after which it was cancelled once again by CBS.
1. The Pacific Northwest is ground zero for reasonably accurate Dude lookalikes.
I dont have much of an update for today except for a couple of things. I have done a few sketches in the last hour or so that I think turned out OK. They are of Doctor Doom.
Laid hundreds of little eggs and this was
The above dog has nothing to do with this post, other than the fact that I took it at work, and this story also takes place at work. Honestly, I’m just trying to lure you in to read my blog, because I’m sly like that.
AAaaaarrrgggghhhhhh!
card with you.
First, you will need pure acetone. I bought a bottle from Sally's for less than $5 and it will last for a long time!
it’s just too hard for me!
Fatima’s greed sees her inherit such a fabulous estate, but at least she shares her good fortune with her
Or was it just today-
According to my 11-year-old, it was “hard but fun.” He didn’t like the background music (designed, it seemed to remind the player that there’s a time limit) and thought it might be cool to see how it went if he said he was, say, 80 and 300 pounds.
It's time to board the TROLLEY again. Jump-on and hold tight. We're leaving Breukelen Station and our Destination is the Williamsburg section of Brooklyn. C'mon.
As I said, we did A LOT of walking. But, there were times that walking wasn’t an option, so we had to find other means of transportation.
“And immediately there fell from his eyes as it had been scales; and he received sight forthwith, and arose, and was baptised.”
How we feel is so much more powerful than what we choose to think about. If you set thinking and feeling at the start line of a sprint, what do you think the results would be? Let’s just say that thinking would be the tortoise and feeling would be the hare! Not that it was totally necessary but science is starting to prove that the feelings we choose to put into motion about things today, truly shape the outcome of our tomorrows. If you ask people who have had what seem to be miraculous, spontaneous healings concerning their deadly cancer prognosis and how it is that they are cancer-free today, many will tell you that how they chose to feel about themselves, their fears and the feeling of unconditional love for themselves is what totally turned things around for them. They allowed feelings of greatness concerning themselves to come front and center, no matter what was told to them otherwise. How could this be? Feelings are an amazing energetic tool we’ve been given that unlock doors that once seemed to be slammed shut, the key nowhere to be found. Feelings are powerful and just like anything that is a precious commodity that has the power to effect change, how we use them can make all the difference in the world, your world. Always remember that results don’t happen on our time clock, but the Universal time clock.
Tonight
You can look at this blog as an inspiration archive and go here any time you need inspiration for a specific Simply Sassy stamp or just want to have a look at the one of the 27 tutorial's we have here.
But the prospect of more screening units being made available remains unlikely, particularly because travel to Croydon is seen by the Home Office as a last resort for those who have broken the rules. So it is a punishment, then..?
Nothing can beat, riding on bad stretches.
And grasshoppers,
Picture-taking has become a huge hobby of mine, and I love sharing the pictures I take. I started a flickr account a few weeks ago, but there's only one picture up so far. I need to learn all the ins and outs of flickr, but that ended up getting filed under "things I can do once the kids are in school." So hopefully I'll work on that in the next few weeks, too.
We would love to see all your cute and cuddlies being used this week ! The DT are this week showcasing Stampabilities stamps this week which includes House Mouse, Peanuts and more. If you have any of this stamps we would love to see you use them but if not, it is not necessary for this challenge, just show us your cute and cuddlies !!!
Can Billi protect Vasalisa from the ancient goddess – and at the same time stop her from destroying the world?
I go with the jingoism. Apollo’s death made the fight personal for Rocky, but his demise was still merely the catalyst for an East v. West conflict. I will grant you the boxing match is the most exciting of all the ones featured so far. I have a tough time believing Rocky could win, but there you go. The speech at the end in which Rocky personally brings on perestroika is as hokey as it gets. Then again, the Soviet Union fell six years later, so what do I know?
Looking at Lines comes with a CD with printable student pages and sells for $24.95.
Mushroom hunting is a true art form. I've been told that some folks can just spot 'em and others could stand right on top of 'em and never see 'em. And that's the truth. I know that because sadly I do not fall in the category of those that can "just spot 'em." I long for that talent, that ability to see. So each year I try.
I especially remember revival meetings for young people or when we went on summer camps in the woodlands. The camp leader, pastor or evangelist spoke to us youngsters, who were about to enter into manhood, that there are things we must remember and be aware of, things in life that are inevitable in the case of puberty, growing up, bodies that develop, arousing sexual feelings, attractiveness, and so on. I especially remember that the pastors back then, often preached about masturbation, or “petting”. I remember how the other boys, aged 12-18 years, worried and confused twisted where they sat with their legs tightly pressed together! In addition to these well known condemning verses in Leviticus, there were other popular stories often quoted, among them the story about Onan and his so called “waste of seed” whence we have the terms onanism for petting or masturbation.
The question we should be asking ourselves everyday and every way is simply: Is it good for the Anglo-Saxons? Only then will Jews and other aggrieved minorities be compelled to respect (and fear) us.
If you're interested in taking part in the Blogger Book Club, make sure to grab our second book:
District 38 (East of Districts 12/16/17, Southern part of Kearney, Excelsior Springs, Mosby, Prathersville, Missouri City, NE tip of Kansas City, and the rest of Liberty): This appears to be where Rep. T.J. Berry will be running.
Y. Yummy food that you make: Potatoes Au Gratin and I make some great porkchops.
“You are forgiven.”
1 dug
To see the cherry hung with snow.
I took it to the auction rooms
to my surprise
From Earl to Enchant by Amelia Grey
“But he did do something pretty extraordinary with a violet . . .”
So, from the bottom of my heart, thank you. Here’s to many more.
Me: Just thought you would've had to think about it for a while.
and the picture attached is my cousin rylen and my sister in laws puppy. adorable right?
The battle against gay marriage will ultimately be lost (like the battle against abortion)unless the church and the culture return to the absolute authority beginning in Genesis. Then and only then will there be a true foundation for the correct doctrine of marriage—one man for one woman for life.
I don't really do ruffles or lots of make up. I am definitely not "high maintenance". I have gone to the store with out make up in my workout clothes.
We both went to the University of Virginia in the fall of 1988. And we both auditioned for Godspell. Yes, the one with Jesus as a travelling clown and his disciples as hippy assistants, only it's somehow lamer than Jesus Christ Superstar. No, I do not have pictures. If I did I'd be a very rich man, and my career would be blackmailing Tina Fey.
Can you believe we only have one challenge left for this year? My, how time flies! We had some awesome participation for last weeks challenge. I think there were over 70 entries. That's fantastic! Everyone is really doing a fabulous job at getting their cards done these days. Gorgeous entries, as always, too. We're so blessed to have you joining us each week. Thanks so much for your participation!
And then i realized, if this blog is about me, my life, and he is a big part of it, you should get to know him a little better! It only makes sense, that ya'll get familiar with the boy who has my heart :)
― Joan Didion, Blue Nights
On top of this, the giant kids seem to go crazy and start rampaging, so with no other option, Usopp uses his Sleep Star to put them down.
I am in the fabby hospitality of the Texans...I have been cowboy hunting but not managed to snag one just yet, will need to practise my lassoing a little bit more methinks.!!
06-22 Scheessel, Germany – Hurricane Festival
My breasts are getting bigger and bigger. I have a few bras that were too big for me and had been put away. I got them out the other day and now one of them fits me perfectly and the other is too small!
me "no I forgot, I will work on it"
Try as I might to get Monday Night Football on the tube, The Sing Off won out again. Linda fixed the remaining snapper we’d bought 3 days ago, sauteed in butter, garlic, and lemon juice. This was certainly a very fine and unproductive day.
Pratyush tries to get himself into the magazine, he is holding and Mahek looks outside the window.
MERCER CO. studies showed that, 70% of companies that simply cut cost in a slowdown, failed to make profitable growth FOR FIVE YEARS!
“That’s awfully traditional,” I remark, sounding thoroughly North American.
“Yes, fitness is very important because when you grow older you will have problems, you will not be able to be that active. Blindly trying to become somebody’s body type is just stupidity,” she told.
I used a base of tan and orange paper and then some bright and fun DP. I colored the image with Distress Inks. Added a little flower brad to her hat, some wide rick rack and a few baby blue rhinestones in corners. My flowers were a gift from my sweet friend Patricia.
The author goes on to allege Israel acquired the necessary knowledge and materials to build a bomb from France, in payment for their help in the 1956 Suez Canal crisis.
I never thought the departure of such a dear friend could cause such an impact on me, but I have been so dejected since they have left. I have hardly been able to rally enough to take any turns through our property, or to see the horses. I have spent much of my time in my room, or pacing about the house like a ghost, lethargic and melancholy.
and spin to the center
Many of the basic principles of this world are based on the philosophy of fear (just scan popular media–they keep us watching by keeping us afraid) and the economics of scarcity. “Don’t take a risk and pursue your dreams, you might be hungry for a day.” Better to hate your work and have security than live free. “Don’t offer compassion to him; he might hurt you.” Better to let others suffer than risk potential suffering. “Don’t give them too much of what you have, someday you might need more.” Better to hoard what little I have than help someone who has less.
1/4 lb bacon
92 The Little Prince – Antoine De Saint-Exupery
Bean was the smallest student at the Battle School, but he became Ender Wiggins’ right hand, Since then he has grown to be a power on Earth. He served the Hegemon as strategist and general in the terrible wars that followed Ender’s defeat of the alien empire attacking Earth. Now he and his wife Petra yearn for a safe place to build a family – something he has never known – but there is nowhere on Earth that does not harbor his enemies – old enemies from the days in Ender’s Jeesh, new enemies from the wars on Earth. To find security, Bean and Petra must once again follow in Ender’s footsteps. They must leave Earth behind, in the control of the Hegemon, and look to the stars.
storage show mc
eagle nest at NCTC her class was watching on the
You'll notice, as she's being denied panties, that there's a number on her uniform. Which is nothing new, as most prisons, clinics and sanatoriums give their "guests" a number (it's a tried and true method when it comes to dehumanizing the people you want to control). What is new, however, is the punishment for when someone fails to use it while referring to either themselves or the other inmates. For example, if you say, see Abbie across the room and you would like to get her attention, don't call out, "Abbie." Instead, try shouting her number, which, in Abbie's case, is 41 (be careful, though, I'm not sure if Greta allows shouting within the walls of her clinic). If you don't, you'll get your number branded just above your left breast. Nowadays, of course, that wouldn't be seen as much of a punishment, as self-mutilation is all the rage. But back in the 1970s, the surface of your flesh was sacred, and having a number burnt into your chest would no doubt severely cramp your style.
Monday, my students were giving presentations on their work placements (internships). They went fine for the most part. I say for the most part because some of them consisted of a lot of technical jargon such as explaining really really complex formulas. That about did my head in. Although Jane had a couple of students who got up and were like "My project was confidential and I'm not at liberty to discuss it". Wow. With all the technical stuff, I had to really keep my mind focused. And then, the one student who was talking about designing airplane engines (complicated but there were no formulas involved) kept saying the "ine" in "engine" like the "ine" in "dine" even after I corrected him. Oy. It annoyed me. But at least after the long morning, I went out for pizzas with my language colleagues which was a good time.
Here are the samples made by our amazing design team.
Ruby-throated hummingbird (Archilocus colubris -now you know why I anamed him Arco lol) are known because of their ruby-colored neck.
By merging the units, Terrorism and National Security and International Narcotics Trafficking, Mr. Bharara said he is combining two groups that have developed many of the same skills — working overseas, often using classified information, to build complex cases against sophisticated targets…
Other reactions I had were more personal. There is a poem in the collection by Fleur Adcock, who visited the Royal Grammar School in Newcastle when I was there. She judged a poetry reading competition (which I didn’t win) for which the test piece was Stevie Smith’s Not Waving but Drowning. I remember that she was quite a glamorous-looking lady, but she got everybody’s name wrong in her presentation address. She must be getting on a bit by now.
Unique make your away while wearing deleterious thinning hair, and / or are developing trainer reduce glossy, except for no reason without using a bank balance.
Do you think she knows who you are?...or look she knows you're her Mommy.
Written by: Gary Barlow / Howard Donald / Jason Orange / Mark Owen /
Step 3. Prepare the nacho chips
June 17, 2011
www.integrityfurniture.com
So like other tourists, when i was exploring the city, i saw posters of the "Light A Lantern Save Jalan Sultan" event pasted everywhere along Jalan Sultan and Jalan Petaling (Jalan = street). Majored in transportation (bachelor degree) and completed my master in Urban Agglomerations last year, and have been travelling all over the world, i can seriously tell you, all historical buildings should be remained untouched.
9. The Passions - I'm In Love With A German Film Star
Top journalist killed in blue light crash
What does this historical situation remind us of?
It is true the savage creature, known as a fox completely malled my last set of hens. Nice of him! So, to really annoy him - I HAVE GOT SOME MORE! Muh haha ... And, I have built a state of the art, fox proof, bad boy of a pen for them. No fox is getting into this hutch, final!
2) Personality: He mentions that your running shoes should match your personality. Are you curious? Risk averse? Train differently? How you answer those questions should be reflected in the shoe you pick (and yes, colour matters!).
Prayer is the contrite sinner’s voice,
What do you do in the privacy of your own home that you wouldn't do elsewhere?
This is a nice set that often gets overlooked. It wouldn't reach the heights of the 1984 set, but it certainly wouldn't reach the doldrums of later years. This was a set made before Donruss got parallel happy and one can see the inspiration of greatness yet to come for Donruss in this set.
RW Johnson on the slipping away of the ruling party's moral dominance
A call, a role is offered to the many and the one,
I suppose she had a point, which I expect you to agree with. Yes, I’m talking to you, Norman.
But as always, the fundamentals here will stay the same: I’m not interested in fine lines of Left and Right, I’m interested in radical realism, equality before the law, and the creation of a liberal democracy prepared to face the need for substance rather than spin.
During the Old Testament period, God gave laws to the Hebrews to help them live righteous lives. He instituted animal sacrifices, which the Hebrews were to make as offerings for sin. These sacrifices were a prefiguration of Christ’s sacrifice, to prepare the people of God to understand and accept the meaning of Christ’s death on the Cross. But neither the sacrifices nor the laws were able to restore mankind to the state he had lost at the Fall.
7C. Düsseldorf Altbier
Using her nervous energy productively, Rachel enters every contest she can find, winning diamond earrings, a honeymoon, a photographer, and two wedding gowns. Her pop culture obsession lands the wedding party on two hit reality TV shows. There’s just one problem as the clock ticks down: Her staunch perfectionism and fear of dancing threaten to derail everything. She has to redefine perfect and embrace the mistakes—or risk
“If you yell or scream, I will kill your daughter,” Ariela remained calm and matter of fact as she slid her knife from her pocket and flicked open the blade. “If you lie to me, I will take your little girl apart piece by piece.”
Do you see me?
Needless to say I was thrilled when Hanna P. contacted me to let me know she made a taggie baby blanket using my tutorial...AND she sent pictures...AND her blanket's SUPER CUTE...AND she said I could share her project with the rest of you. Like I said, it totally made my day!
The bill, which hasn’t yet been released, would require companies that provide encrypted communications to be able to break into those coded signals upon receiving a legal wiretapping order, according to the Times. It would also require companies that provide peer-to-peer software, such as Skype, to be able to spy on phone calls and instant messages made over that software, which probably would require fundamental changes in the way those applications work.
We arrived at the emergency room 6:30ish and they started the process of sending me home about 11:30. During that time the doctor examined my foot, they drew blood for tests and hooked me up to an IV, started fluids, gave me a tetanus shot, hauled my ass to the bathroom when I had to pee, gave me the minimum dose of morphine, drew more blood, doctor came in and talked to me, more morphine, and
And thus we get into the reason why protecting free speech is so important – there is a tendency to marginalize opinions that we disagree with, that are controversial, or that we find offensive. This is what we must watch out for, because human logic is fallible, popularity is a fickle thing, and offense is in the eye of the beholder. How long will it be before someone declares your ideas offensive, and therefore off the table? There is no protection against this other than the protection of free speech.
characterized by large firm beads that bursts with an intensely rich and nutty flavor
You are just mad because you lost and you know I always win, he said. No. No, that’s not it. I am angry at the injustice the two of you exercise, my still legal husband and former good friend who I confided in all the while she was busy “collecting” for her own agenda. Under NO circumstances would HER ex (if she’d ever had a relationship, that is) EVER get me to climb into the sack with him so he could tell her former bestie “I won.” I am hurting to the core because I was abused not just by one of you but by the TWO of you. He is abusing her just to get to me. Even now. But she is even sillier than I was at 19 and who am I to interfere with her belief of ALL of his lying. Of course, she lied, too. To herself and to me whilst titillating her ego with thoughts of true love. The only thing psychopaths truly love is THEMSELVES.
A superficially logical argument has been made by several of our readers to the effect that the endless television coverage of dead or injured Palestinian children (the anti-Israeli bias of the leftist BBC is particularly marked) will inflame Islamist extremists against not only Israel but also against other Western states, including the UK and our soldiers currently stationed in Iraq and Afghanistan.
3) A wooden spoon (I dedicate 1 wooden spoon solely for cooking pineapple jam
Come travel back in time with me as we explore the future.
The band released their first album in 1975 but did not reach commercial success until they hired new lead singer Steve Perry in 1977. With Perry on vocals, the group took off and started a long string of chart hits that included such classics as:
As an e-publishing strategy this is all upside down and back-to-front. You should start with the first title, not the last. Quickly, quickly, I must get the other titles formatted and commission new jacket designs, but until this is complete my series will be all in bits. To get five Sprite titles out as e-books this year will require time, money and focus. To date the return has not come
The Upsetters - Cool And Easy
A few weeks ago I was delighted to be asked by Billy Flag to design an EP cover for The Dead Flags. Seeing as I had so much fun designing one for EleventyFour not so long ago, I jumped at the chance. The band wanted something a bit Hitchcock, a bit Saul Bass and a bit retro in style. After a few listens to the tracks I zeroed in on the idea of using hands in the design, as each song is linked by references to either hands, touching or holding. And here's what the result was:
Having both a structured training plan and the Wasatch Range to train in, gives me a great deal of confidence to do well come July. In the weeks between now and then, I will use this Blog to share thoughts not only on how my 48 year old body is responding to this level of training, but also the challenges of juggling all of this with being a Husband and a Dad, as well as working a full time job. I am sure I will learn a lot about myself in the next three months. While that is not always a pleasant thing, I pray I will be able to manage it all, knowing no matter how hard I try I can never do it solely on my own strength, but that of a God that has not given up on me, even when at times I have given up on myself. That's all for now...I need to go run!
19. Etter-Woodworth, Maria. Signs and Wonders, Harrison House. 1916 reprint. Pg. 145
King had shown no previous evidence of being a "racist" before he went to prison, but he had become one by the time he came out. This does not, in any way excuse what was done to James Byrd Jnr, but who can doubt that had a black man been repeatedly raped and brutalised by white men, this would most certainly have been held up as mitigation no matter how awful a crime he then went on to commit.
That surrounds me
When I watch movies that include the perfect ideal of happy sisterhood, or laughing sisters hanging out with their mom, it’s no different than an episode of The Twilight Zone. I want my sister and I to be close. She is so much closer to other smokers and any stray dog on the street, including that guy she’s dating.
May 8, 2012 3:17 PM – Add me back to your facebook.
Geography is not everybody’s idea of a good time but it can be fun, especially when you make a game of finding all places shaped like male genitalia. (Here’s lookin’ at you, Nova Scotia!) Condo marketers like geography too, especially when it involves making it up.
When I turned on to Boylston, it was bittersweet. Relief that all the discomfort I was in would go away. Sadness that it would be over all too soon. If it’s possible, the heat seemed to swell even more in this short .2 mile stretch. But I kicked it in past the shouting crowds, past the grandstands, past the Finish line.
But heaven has shown me miracles,
Peter happily said, “I know Mom! That’s why we poked a hole in the top and bottom of each egg and BLEW THEM OUT!”
Sadly, this is the image that many non-writers have of those who do what I do. Quite apart from the fact that I never get up at 5am and have no dog or wife, I do wonder when these 10-hour-a-day novelists (usually novelists) ever did all the other things that aren't writing. Let me list some of them, in the rough chronological order of the life of a book - all except the actual writing:
It is this last point that really had me thinking the most. It’s a simple premise to remember when dating, that:
Bulges rose. Hearts pounded. Blood rushed. Female love buttons throbbed. Nipples tingled. Somehow they maintained their composure.
“For several months, we have been moving forward and are being released in small increments. We are in the birth canal –the tunnel– and in that space it is near impossible to ‘see’ anything. We feel we are not connected to anything. Alone in the tunnel, we have been traveling on a raft with no wind behind us, no oars and in still waters, with no-one to left or right. But now we are moving forward and this new movement is creating the strange feeling of being in two places at once.” Karen Bishop Emerging Earth Angels
You can, too! Want to see your work appear on the Watcher’s Council homepage in our weekly contest listing? Didn’t get nominated by a Council member? No worries.
After about two hours remove the chicken from the spit and let it rest wrapped in foil before carving into portions.
a life where they do not add to me
The Heroes of Ganchimi is a story that began as a joint effort with my son, Joshua, when he was five years old. I was commuting to the Seminary at the time, which meant I was away from home from Sunday night until Friday night every week for almost three years. Before beginning this arduous task, the idea was to help get him through the first year by doing something together that would progress each week until the end of the term. Because he loves to read, the idea arose to write a story. We talked about a general idea for the story, and then that first week away, I wrote the first chapter. I came home, read it to him, and then we talked about what would happen next. With that, you can see, although the writing was my job, the ideas were shared. And so it went for a very long time.
Some seeking to be lifted up,
Hey lovers! I will post the winner of the contest by the end of today, and some other entries that we loved!
Story: The last three years of this pride’s existence was some story!
Also.....I'll be moving out of my old room and up into the attic. When it's all done up I will be decorating it all Loli like^^ I've already got all of my furniture.
I’ll leave it here for now so that you can digest all these facts and figures. I’m off to have a beer (not a VB) and you might want to do the same.
i am creating...
because you never forget watching your child have the time of their life.
After I was left holding a pile of lost dreams, I had a few choices to make. What I kept hearing was that I was not good enough, that my voice did not matter enough. But I know better.
“I cannot for myself, imagine how juridical notions can be founded on such vague conceptions. The conduct of human life consists of choices, and it is a very large undertaking indeed to outlaw some particular grounds of choice, unless you can confine yourself to such blatant combinations of circumstances as are unlikely to have any typical embodiment in this country. I try to distinguish in my mind between an act of discrimination and an act of preference, and each time the attempt breaks down.”
Benson loves his toys now and puts whatever he can get into his mouth. You will usually see him eating his hands. He often gets one of his arms out of his sleepsack while sleeping and when you go in to get him he is sucking on it. Benson loves kisses and no matter where you kiss him, he will give you the biggest open mouth smile instantly. I joked with Ryan that when Benson get his "First Kiss" he is going to make this same face and the girl is going to think he is a weirdo.
Jennie King is a television reporter reporting on the poverty of children in foreign countries. She was injured in a car bombing while on assignment, restricting her abilities to perform her job duties. While in the hospital, her Amish grandmother sent her a handmade quilt with a note welcoming Jennie to her Amish home for healing.
My mom turns 75 this year. My dad is, I think, 77. I resolve to spend more time with them over the coming year. Drive up and see them, at least once a season: spring, summer, fall, winter. It can be during the week or over the weekend. It's only two hours away and it's shameful how infrequently I see them when there's only that much space between us. I WILL do this. In fact, I'm thinking of maybe packing up Mom and driving her down to Cary (North Carolina) to visit with Debbie over Spring Break.
Overhead squat x 10, 95 lbs
ose that's too many chips, so I'd better come up with some other ideas too. But this is one of my favourite salsas ever. I love chunky crunchy salsa that isn't a bowl of homogeneous mush. Even the older boys loved it.
First week, I lost weight. Fine. Great.
The Ungamer-- This person doesn't need no stinking games! They've either got other hobbies / methods / time wasters, or they are just so completely focused they need nothing else.
"Yes, okay you can"
Gambar 4: 'Aahh. It feels good. Wake me up when you are done with your shopping'.
Women – will but in anything.
As I am living in Hong Kong now, my blog posts are going to be about cooking using what I can get my hands on here. It’s an amazing place to live with a huge variety of restaurants and a mixture of cultures that prints a very distinct stamp on local dishes. I cook all sorts of things. I will write about the things I feed my family, fail safe recipes for entertaining, tips and cheats I have discovered along the way, food for hot weather, comfort food, nostalgia food, food in a hurry, feasts, holidays and celebrations. I welcome suggestions too, so please leave a comment, or email me if you would like to see me write about something. I also welcome freebies and large sums of cash. So if you want me to test out your product, then send me a sample and I’ll see what I can do. I’m a hungry whore, innit
Now, what to do with this? For one thing, I will be giving up this blog. At Rebecca's urging, I will leave it up for awhile, but I won't be accepting comments, checking stats, or any of the other traps we fall into when we blog. Second, I am going to take the first steps of seeking entrance into the Third Order. I have not yet decided whether I would like to pursue the chapter at my own parish or the one where our dear Theresa presides. I have to say I am leaning toward the latter. Finally, I'm going to take my boss's simple advice and let go and let God take over.
AcuGraph User Manual: If you somehow lost your manual, here’s a copy for you!
We see a huge Indian brave climbing on the roof, carrying a blanket. The Indian places the blanket over the chimney and when the smoke gets too intense in the cabin, Stults & the bodyguards run out. When Stults stumbles off the proch, the Indian is there, mounted on his horse, a bow & arrow drawn taught. The Indian sends the arrow straight into Stults, killing him, and then rides off with the bodyguards firing their pistols after him.
Reign in this shit Scorpio and open up your eyes.
I have a theory about los ninos: Odd numbered years*: suck. Case in point: The Geej at age two? Such a joy. Easy. Happy. Totally blew that whole "Terrible Twos" myth out of the water. Age three:. She was 49% angel, 51% sassy-ass demon spawn. It wasn't fun. Four has been a hilarious, wonderful dream. But five is looming on the very near horizon, and girlfriend is showing signs of the Odd Year-ed Demon, and I'm not loving it. ANNOYING!!
The border shines like gold.
Schneider recommends having a plan for pets too, including emergency food supplies and an accessible place to keep a picture of your pet and proof of ownership. This may be needed at a shelter, or if the pet is lost.
They are also hosting a poster design contest if you think you have the skills to pay the bills scope out their contest page!
As for the loitering problem downtown…we do have a police department, don’t we??? We have laws on the books. As usual we don’t use our existing tools to solve problems. The only way to turn Pottstown around is to clean it up. The police department is a key part of the equation. Playing opera only keeps undesirables away while the music is playing. We need to send a clear message that we will not tolerate this behavior on our streets and that can only be done by enforcing the law. Private citizens can not do that.
However, Epstein gets way more criticism than he really deserves. Sure, Duquette made moves that helped the Red Sox win the World Series, but Epstein made important moves that finally got them there. He signed David Ortiz to a cheap contract after he left the Twins. He brought Terry Francona to Boston after the Grady Little fiasco in the 2003 playoffs, which paid off immediately. He chased down Curt Schilling on Thanksgiving and made the crucial decision to trade Nomar Garciaparra for Orlando Cabrera at the trade deadline during the '04 season. He stocked the Red Sox farm system with solid talent, drafting All-Stars Jonathon Papelbon, Dustin Pedroia, Clay Buchholz and Jacoby Ellsbury in his first three drafts from 2003-2005.
This is the invitation that we're basing everything off of. I am so happy with how it came out. I can't wait for this shower. I love this baby too much for me to handle already. I can't wait to meet him!
– Open eyes
Title: Faerie Wings
Kids are all sleeping and even managed to catch one of Roman's "episodes" on video and have forwarded that via email to the neuro so we shall see what he has to say this week.
An ancillary consideration is whether attorneys should sign official PTO documents on behalf of their clients. While certainly permissible according to the Rules, presenting these documents to the client, with careful instructions for review and signature, could create a higher level of attention to the accuracy of the information contained therein. In view of the current climate, such a practice may be prudent.
Style: 10
Look on the bright side.
I'm now working on The Sewing Workshop Trio Top out of the stripe brocade to go with the pants. I also have the RPL in the washing machine getting ready to go.
These are just a few of the weaknesses in the traditional account of Muhammad's life and the early days of Islam:
This means no meat, dairy products, SUGAR, white flour...all of the good stuff!
Do you ever reminisce?
Consider using a template that enables per recipient to receive a customized message within the greeting. People respond more favorably to emails that address them personally, and so are less likely to reject your message. This personalization is easy to accomplish, and definately will grow a greater relationship with the customers.
Hurley kneels down and talks to Libby. "A lot of crazy stuff's been happening. I kinda wish I could talk you about it in person. A lot of people come and talk to me when they've...you know...gone. It'd be nice if you did too."
I was the last person in the world to hear the song. If not the last but close to the last because I heard the song on a television program three years ago, a contest to discover the lead singer for a band of super stars - hence Super Nova. His name was Lukas Rossi and as he performed this Radiohead classic the hair on my arms stood on end. I imagine it is only a two minute version, but I was electrified.
1. Is this legit/clean money? I know that Mexico has some issues with drug trafficking and I just can’t get involved with that kind of thing. I read an article (
The Riesling is particularly adapted to that specific climate. The Fourwinds winery, a family owned property, has been distinguished with a gold medal at the regional fair. I personally liked their Merlot, which should be kept at least three more years before tasting, like a Bordeaux, to express its full personality.
I ended up not being upset at all about not going to Akaraka. There was a brief moment when I thought Big Bang was on campus, but it turned out to be a false alarm. No big. HA PUN. Crystal and I walked along the main street in the afternoon hoping to see some of the tents they had had set up, but they were all closed down. Which I found a little strange and ridiculous, but whatever. Then we went to lunch in Sinchon at this little restaurant I’ve been wanting to try for a while because their food looks so good. Turns out I was right. I got some tonkatsu over rice with an egg and it was marvelous. Equally marvelous was the Cookie Vanillla Bubble Tea we waited in line for back on campus. There’s a little place attached to the student union that is really cheap, but it’s always super busy, so I rarely have the time or the inclination to haul myself over there. Might have to start making an effort though.
I thought I'd give away some vintage style candy to celebrate that spring is officially here (I've put out the garden chairs on the patio) and that I have blogged for 3 years ( I started this blog in March 2009) and that my hit counter has passed 70 000.
Adam Sandler – “Done”
For the past few years I have only dealt with one kind of woman. The kind who runs and scampers around the clubs with tight dresses and too much make up. I found most of these girls are the same, similar issues and lifestyles. Not until I went to MegaCon that my eyes opened a bit to what “Interesting” actually meant.
The “Christmas Season.” It’s only a hot month long, and everybody has plans–plans for good and not evil. Parties and get-togethers, shopping for friends and family, dinners, celebrations, and the distribution of gifts. This is a good year for me–I’ve been blessed and fortunate to have worked all year, so I have gifts for everyone! I also was very systematic with shopping–I started in September, thank you very much! So as of now, I’m pretty much done. I have to get the husband a couple of more things, and maybe a few little fun stocking stuffers for the ladies, but THAT’S IT.
Write their names in the book of life and give them the grace to serve you for the rest of their lives and from this moment onward, anytime they call on you please answer them in Jesus name. Thank you Almighty.
As the hustle and bustle of the day passes and the quiet darkness of the night settles upon us, a funny thing happens. The daytime Waffles who loves a silly joke and a spot of reality tv (hang on kids, I just need to check the caramelization of the meat before I can plate up and check that I have my thirty-seven components in place) is replaced with The Snorers Wife. Now I'm sure that The Snorers Wife would appreciate a good joke over a glass of red if she weren't so damn tired. The Snorers Wife is a woman who would just about kill for a good nights sleep.
Perhaps this mostly applies to fields in which the tenure-track years involve building labs and research groups and other time-intensive activities that are necessary for new and exciting research projects to be launched and for at least some research goals achieved. I bet, however, that it also applies to any field in which more ambitious research can only be undertaken once you have developed a certain network of colleagues and contacts and attained the awesome knowledge that only comes with experience (says middle-aged me).
First off, I am going to say that Lesnar should not have lost to Cena at Extreme Rules. It makes Lesnar look weak. The big, bad, unstoppable machine really needed to win that match. They hype Lesnar up as this monster, but he loses in his FIRST match. The whole Cena losing storyline was interesting and they could’ve kept that going for a while. It would’ve been something new and fresh that we have never seen, but the WWE really messed up big time.
We get into cyclical ruts around the Whiskey Forge — watching a month’s worth of Tosh.0 in one sitting, for instance, reading everything a particular author published, or tucking into the glazed pork belly time and time again from our favorite neighborhood joint, Carnitas’ Snack Shack.
a little bit o' Miracle Whip
We are the unknowing guinea pigs in an international Monsanto-FDA experiment, with media collusion and no records kept.
Or you can become comfortable with your sources of business – even when your niche is shrinking. After all, you understand these types of customers. You know their personalities. You are familiar with how these particular people will react to your ideas. Isn’t this great, you think.
I've sketched Roy a few times over the years, but this is the first time I've ever rendered him in color. I never had to think about how the transition from human to poodle should look until now.
Modern China have no soul. It has been exctincted. The government is cruel to you, and so are you to each other. Cruelty is a part of the chinese life. Suffering is seen as normal. China is hell, populated by dead walking bodies.. I saw very few humans over there. I will never forget what you are, how you treated me. I had no anger against you untill now, I travelled a lot and saw a lot of shit, but sorry, you are the worst people I’ve met.
(Moving up one spot) 8.) The Nine Lives of Elfego Baca (Episodes 3-4, 6-10) – Staring Robert Loggia (Jagged Edge, Oliver & Company), this historical fiction western first appeared in 1958 on Disneyland for 8 episodes. Episodes one, two and five were released on DVD in 2005 with the first three episodes of The Swamp Fox as part of the Walt Disney Treasures collection. The final 7 episodes and the theatrical film from 1962, made from the various episodes edited down to make up the film, have never been released on DVD.
for more information on the fistula foundation, or to donate, please google “the fistula foundation,” click through, or use the FF widget in the sidebar.
Gwenyth Killigrew, the Witch of Kerrow is used to being woken up in the dead of night. At the spinsterly age of 30, Gwenyth has been performing the duties of healer and midwife for Kerrow and the surrounding lands for many years. Very little could shake the unflappable calm that comes with Gwenyth’s beauty, experience, and her ability of second Sight.
“Those are all insane hypotheticals and I promise you they won’t happen.”
Time has flown by this past Summer, and this was a project made in the midst of Summer, that I almost forgot to post about. It just took me quite some time to take the five minutes involved in taking some photos. Some projects are just plain fun to make, others are made out of necessity. This was definitely a case of the latter. It is not a good thing to be hatless in the harsh sun that we get here. And I do like those necessity projects that take any guilt out of spending the day sewing.
From @givetreegifts
· Move to another area and see if the sounds are the same or different.
I wind and wind, feel the pressure build.
....so, here is TUESDAY SHOWCASE ......
Wakefield M, Germain D, Durkin S. How does increasingly plainer cigarette packaging influence adult smokers’ perceptions about brand image? An experimental study. Tobacco Control 2008;17(6):416-21.
4 sound
You’ve probably heard that there are different learning styles. Anyone trying to educate knows to accommodate visual and auditory learners. But did you know there’s a third learning style? It’s kinesthetic/tactile. Ugh–does anyone know how to spell that word? It shows my point exactly. No one knows how to spell it, because it is the forgotten one–learning based on movement.
The premise is good. Instead of glorifying some nutbar psychopath spree killer, we try and come at the experience through the mother of the spree killer. It’s kind of reverse Freudian cinema of sorts.
Luv It - creates a Big Heart from 10 geometric shapes.
All seven students are currently on home detention awaiting their next court hearing on Jan. 18.
I also found out early on that Indy loved to be the center of attention and loved to model anything. If you look at pictures that she wearing something she sits up proud and is like "look at me!" She was quite the character! She somehow knew when I was taking pictures to look all cute, Maui usually closed his eyes for the camera and just wanted his belly rubbed.
We think it’s safe to say that this is the only event of its kind out there — combining great NOSQL keynote talks with intense and practical hands on tutorials. So there’s no time to waste — the Progressive NOSQL Tutorials start May 9 at Skills Matter.
How significant was it that Jacques should be born at the dawn of a new century? This was to be the beginning of a new age in society, art and architecture, a thoroughly modern age where children rejected the weighty inheritance of their forefathers. Jacques followed his father into the architectural trade, but in a very different register. He was one of the founders of l'Atelier du Palais de Bois a group of students who rejected traditional architectural teaching at the Ecoles de Beaux Arts, and chose instead to study under the modernist Auguste Perret.
Now I live in Georgia with my grandparents. Things have settled down, and I’m trying to get back on track. But then I remember–I’ve been away from home for half a year. I’m 18–an adult. I think about home so often that I forget that I’m an adult; being away from home is a part of growing up! I have to embrace my adulthood; I’m not a child anymore.
Quick question – Name all the Indian Idol winners. (Please don’t tax your brain, this was a rhetorical question). My point is that there are just way too many reality shows on TV right now. In fact, every single show is either a soap opera or a reality show. MTV has stopped showing music altogether and has effectively become the 24-hr roadies channel. There are probably 4 singing reality shows, 4 dancing reality shows, cooking shows, Bigg Boss, Swayamvar and others currently on air. The way things are going i won’t be surprised if a “India’s best houemaid” reality show is commissioned soon to find the best Bai in all of India (with Shiney Ahuja being the host of course)
"Reverend Mother always says when the Lord closes a door, somewhere he opens a window"
I coloured her with my Copics and paper pieced her dress.
But the HGC, which has carried out a lengthy review of the merits of the database, said evidence had emerged of police arresting people purely so they could take their DNA.
“Recent research shows that social class measured by income and education can be more powerful than genetics in predicting future health problems, including obesity.”
Then I remembered that I have been meaning to make this Eva Dress pattern into a peplumed skirt for over a year. And one of my sewing resolutions for the year is to make more separates, so it was just perfect!
Thank you again to all of you.
Add in tomato,salt,ginger and fry until soft.
My garden is looking good, and in fact, it is looking even better than these pictures.
Congratulations Molossus!!!
"I don't think so. It's a 10 hour drive."
would you think that the branch had an ulterior motive?
"Though a sectoral, geographic and multi-layered patchwork is likely, a scenario with a more unified system is not impossible either. There are significant benefits for citizens, governments and commercial operators to have a more standardised system that would support a large range of eGovernment services and functions. One system would eliminate the need for multiple cards, would increase the possibility for interconnecting systems", and the list goes on.
Don't laugh. All that is quite common in South Africa today.
And so, yesterday morning, my husband and I, along with our family, buried our little Gianna. Our daughter was treated as a human being, with the dignity and respect that should be given to all people, but sadly, isn’t. One thing we can hope for is that, through her death, at least one of the many people involved will come to an understanding of the sanctity of life. Regardless of the pain and loss we feel now, regardless of all the pain that is yet to come (and we are far from through with our mourning), God is good, because in the midst of this pain we have the sure joy of having cared for our child in the best possible way we could in the time that we had her.
This gelato day is the cursed of all the weekdays because the weekend is the worst!! Everyone and their mother, and even their mother’s mother comes in! Then you have to get them all gelato, and it’s a TON of gelato. It’s a mess too, the paddles get all sticky, and you get all sticky, and the floor, and the walls, and well… you get the picture.
We were playing baseball out in the backyard, with him facing the house, from the back of the yard. Bad idea. Much to my surprise, he hit the ball so hard, it almost broke our neighbors window! Then, he hit the ball so hard, this happened...
so that’s my payback for the missed Valentine’s post b~
Mom: Derek, stop. He doesn’t want to come down. You know he’s feeling low.
The first step is to be a guest at a meeting of the Legion of Mary.
And as to the military discipline: Allah (swt) said in Surah As-Saff (Rows or Ranks):
Starring (named by us): Ashlee! Danielle! And Stanley, the double-jointed transvestite with the novelty teeth!
~Greg Glassman
Now fuck off. I've got some work to delegate to my advertising agency.
Wei had no such troubles. The men he had lost were merely pawns in the game – pieces on a chess board to be sacrificed when necessary or advantageous. The battles he had lost were only temporary setbacks. Wei knew that he would always rise back to the top … one way or another. He always had. The battles he had won … well, those were better remembered during the day in front of his fellow commanders with greater embellishments each time the story was retold.
she asked me if I had seen "the girl to my left."
And at 70, you’ll get a special weapon. If you’re an Aran:
Not meant to be so I created another page.
These are people who have had an excellent education, a comfortable upbringing and hold down good jobs with respectable salaries yet who prefer to cloak themselves in a veneer of bohemia to improve their street cred. There's nothing cool or even remotely artistically credible about having parents in the 16th arrondissement and a family holiday home in Cap Ferret. And so they slum it in ateliers and lofts in the 10th and 11th arrondissements, smoking hand-rolled cigarettes and wearing designer trainers with their H&M jeans.
Finally, treat it gently. Do not pull it into tight hair styles such as pony tails. Remember to brush it gently and find a good hairdresser who will treat it gently too. Also try to sleep on a satin pillow or cover your hair to reduce the friction on it while you sleep.
Stop by Harlem Restaurant on Richmond near Church for Roots Lounge, Ontario’s longest running poetry slam series, brought to you by Up From the Roots. Show starts at 8pm. Three rounds of slam and a cash prize for the winner. Hosted by Dwayne Morgan. $5 at the door.
Describing Rose’s “Final Comeback,” Sullivan wishes he could dance like today’s new, improved Axl, who “from the beginning … has been the only indispensable white male rock dancer of his generation,” and who now, after the familiar fluid moves onstage in New York, “is gazing at the crowd with those strangely startled yet fearless eyes, as though we had just surprised him in his den, tearing into some carrion.”
I’ve actually never received more compliments on how I look than I am getting in my second trimester. Based on my history with weight gain, I expected to blow up when I got pregnant. I thought that I would just become round and bloated, being 5 feet tall and all. Instead, I’m pretty much all belly, which suits me if I do say so myself. This is part to the fact that the baby has literally wedged himself UNDER my hipbone (as my bladder likes to remind me now by refusing to actually hold anything) – according to my hubby, my hips have actually moved UP an inch rather than spread. Leave it to my kid to completely mess with the simple process of how to lay in a womb.
Pictures of the exterior of a home should be taken in early evening or morning – not midday, direct sun. Morning and early evening light is most complimentary and will give you better quality images.
A Very Merry Unbirthday
And it’s beautiful, beautiful
Editor’s Note: Parasol’s has changed ownership as of 2010 and is no longer a dive and the food is even better. Check out my updated writeup here.
R2: 2 sc in each sc around. (12 sts)
Flying Dog Brewery
On Monday I let the girls stay up late and wait for Grant to get home and we did a special family home evening and ate a heart shaped pizza and a heart shaped cookie. Then it was off to bed, and time for mommy and daddy cuddle time on the couch watching tv. I must say that holidays are so much fun now because Sienna understands what's going on. All last week she told everyone about the date we were going to go on for Valentines. It was really sweet. I'm savoring it now, because 10 years from now she'll laugh at the idea of going on a "date" with mom and dad.
I knocked on their window and said jokingly that I was the KKK member they were looking for.
Laser-like focus does not come naturally for the artistic and the intellectually curious – and I’m not advocating losing that curiosity. Being curious is fine. Just beware starting another project – which is exactly what researching and brainstorming IS. Starting is fun, but it is too often the enemy of finishing. And being available for everything stops you from doing anything.
Instead of watching the Superbowl yesterday, I went to the Superbowl of Cuteness! My friends and I got together with their adorable kids, Sinjin and Katie for a great Sunday afternoon. It has been a year since our last gathering and the kids have grown so much!
I lost 3.4 lbs this week and 1.5 inches!
One of the most important things a deer hunter should learn is how to read the body language of your quarry. I feel it’s a very valuable asset to add to your repertoire.
TY: Do you have an end game? How long before you come to the conclusion that this is just not going to happen and you stop querying your current manuscript(s)?
so ladies, thank you! i'm so glad to call each one of you a new friend.
Sometimes it’s not a person, it’s a thing, a place, an event….it can be something that happens that crashes your view of the world, making you question everything, feeling so confused you no longer know up from down. You cannot hold onto who you were, or what the world used to look like, because everything’s changed now. You really are like a chicken that hatched from the egg, because everything looks new to you. Even yourself.
I knew we were off to a great start when the first booth we saw upon entering the main room was Mozza. Regular readers know that Pizzeria and Osteria Mozzas are two of my favorite restaurants in LA, and they didn't disappoint with an incredibly smooth, creamy and yieldy ball of burrata topped with roasted tomato, basil and bread crumbs for contrasting crunch.
"Do you mind, Deanna?" I snap, "I'm recording my private thoughts here."
3Is it not trouble for the sinner, and destruction for the evil-doers?
I am in a major mood funk. I would love to get out of it. I think there’s several things probably causing it.
And then there’s defense industrial cooperation. The Defense Department could also consider expanding cooperative R&D with Taiwan’s Industrial Technology Research Institute (ITRI), Chungshan Institute of Science and Technology (CSIST), and/or private industry. Taiwan is a world leader in technology innovation, particularly in applied information and communications technology, which should be leveraged for mutual benefit. Taiwan’s requirement for diesel electric submarines has been validated for island defense, and could play a critical role in interdicting amphibious ships transiting from mainland China in waters northwest and southwest of Taiwan, counter-blockade operations, and surveillance. U - Boats are a credible, survivable deterrent. Defense Department and its Taiwanese counterparts should consider the formation of an innovative capabilities working group that could also incorporate representatives from think tanks and both countries’ defense industries. Possible focus areas might include cruise missile defense, anti-submarine warfare (ASW), multi-domain awareness, and Taiwan’s central role in Great Satan"s rebalancing toward Asia. The fact is that no free and open society understands China as well as Taiwan. Unfortunately, few Great Satan military officers conduct in-country training in Taiwan, and there are no known students attending Taiwan’s National Defense University (NDU)
Vast sectors of women religious in the USA have for decades been infested with a radical feminism so poisonous that many of them, especially in leadership, have even come to defend the killing of babies.
If we walk in the Light, and the Glory of God is lived in our lives, then why do we box ourselves into a conformity that
3/4 tsp garlic salt (if you don’t like garlic or if you don’t have garlic salt, regular salt will work just fine)
Grind the soaked ingredients with coconut, red chillies and green chillies to a fine paste.
pit crew running interference to swipe clean her path
* Each camper was "fairy godmother" to another camper, leaving him or her notes, small gifts, and so on. The fairy godmothers' identities were never revealed.
Gram dal- 1 teaspoon
This morning is a perfect example of why I love this time of year because it's a lovely bright, sunny morning with just a slight nip in the air. I hope it's like this next week as my OH and I are off to Wales for a few days and I'm hoping to see some pretty scenery dressed in my favourite colours of Autumn.
Couture swimwear - mix and match sets from €17.50 a piece featuring Betty Paige inspired high-waist shorts for jelly bellies. Nice.
Our challenge this week is Magical Creatures (unicorns, faires, angels, dragons etc). It's a fun one that's for sure:) We can't wait to see whatcha come up with :)
sensations of the mind
My heart, body and devotion belongs to One.
With love and trust’s cruel disappearance
Right now I feel like I am being urged to be still and listen. I have spent so much of my life making decisions for me, rarely thinking about the fact that only He knows what is best for my life and that He has a better plan for me. True to child form, I have made so many mistakes but through all this, I am learning. I am learning to be still, to listen and to wait to find out what's next. My heart is soft; I'm ready.
God can’t make you choose Him over Satan, heaven over hell, life over death, health over sickness, prosperity over poverty, even though it breaks His heart to see His very own beautiful creation make a horrible mistake. God is so sovereign that He has to keep His own Word and let us choose.
Comfortable and very informal with fabulously friendly service, Banfield's is a great place to just hang out and relax while enjoying good ol'-fashioned hearty food.
And Toby was not what you would consider sociable; he never learned to tolerate other dogs. He was overly protective of me when we were out walking. And until Doug won him over with a juicy hamburger, still warm from a neighbor's barbecue, Toby hadn't wanted to allow him in the house. (Which would be a problem, given that Doug and I eventually married.)
While the other designers showed sartorial elegance with printed fabrics from Dries Van Noten, brilliant tailoring as usual from Saint Laurent and soft leather outerwear (Hermes doing what they do best), CDG knocked me out the most this season. Wouldn't it be great to see a band dressed like this for a change?
You've stood waiting for a train. On a platform. On your own. Fairly bored.
Bake 25 to 30 minutes or until center is almost set. Cool to room temperature. Chill a few hours in the refrigerator.
he wrote a poem
Cozy is ... a firepit on a cool fall evening.
I flipped my hair with a little swagger. "Well, I hate to brag, but that isn't the first time I've been told that."
falling in love.
So a developer owns a home jointly with his wife which is worth €2m today. The NAMA deal requires the wife to agree to her half, worth €1m, to be brought into the pot which the developer will use to pay down his loan or develop his projects. This may require the house to be sold or the wife might have her own unencumbered wealth, a bank account in her own name for example, of €2m (to cover both the husband’s and her shares) which if handed over to NAMA would allow the couple to remain in the house. In addition to helping secure cooperation from NAMA which might see the husband’s debt partly forgiven, the wife will also be entitled to the first €500,000 from any sale. Debt forgiveness NAMA-style.
I’m not exactly sure how to describe what happens to me after I come back from Japan, but it’s been the same both times: I come back and the contrast between my life here and what I had/did/learned in Japan is so strong that it takes me a while to get back into the flow of my normal life. I’m not depressed, although it feels that way a little bit. It’s more like having to come down from some kind of excellent high, but without all of the bad side effects.
But, he did not.
I have struggled with how to present this story for the last few weeks, and I will probably botch it now, but here goes.
Beans and Grains
Been doing lots of spring stuff--you know, garden stuff, one had prom this weekend, and the oldest is graduating from college this year. What have you been working on? Leave me a link; I'm very snoopy, it's true, and will always come by for a look!
I think that the younger woman realised that they were holding up a few people in the queue behind them and turned to me, as I was next in line, and as some sort of consolation for the delay, gave me a sickly, and not very convincing smile. I could, I suppose have been polite and generous and smiled back, but I wasn’t in the mood, so I pointed one of my blank stony-faced stares back at her. It was like water off a duck’s arse though and she straightway went back to her pondering and choosing…
me: It’s time for dinner in a few minutes…
I am probably repeating myself but I find on our local Anglo-info website there are many newcomers asking where they can find English speaking this and that (doctors, dentists, vets, notaries, accountants etc.) wondering where they can find English builders, carpenters, plumbers, where are the schools that take English pupils etc will my 5 or 10 or 15 yr old settle in as they don’t want to move out here etc… don’t these people do their homework? From my experience, children adjust far quicker than their parents.
1 medium lemon, thinly sliced
Confidential State Policy may seem like an oxymoron, but readers will be aware of the reluctance of the Education Facilities Company Limited to publish its new Confidentiality Policy. I don’t want to say refusal, but when this budget season is over we will be continuing to examine those EFCL operations.
I can't do it without YOU, though. In order to ride, the BHE and I must raise $500 each for the American Lung Association. If you'd like to help, just click one of the donation links in my side bar.
Waking up with a bruise/ sore muscle or two, I may well have called in sick if it was a week day – too ill for the usual farce of struggling to hide my hangover all day.
No blinking for me!
and conscious vibrant immortality
First time through:
Entries are as follows...
L E T ’ S TA L K
HSN has a Studio Barse bronze ring with either a turq, coral or tiger’s eye stone. No. 1, we don’t care if the prices of silver and gold have skyrocketed, we have the bronze and copper pieces that have replaced it, especially on HSN. Now we have bronze Studio Barse and Nicky Butler and Hilary Joy jewelry in those metals.
Wise girls, they are chocolate fans. So I called on Martha again for her one-bowl chocolate wonder cake, and I used my usual vanilla buttercream recipe. Twinfully, sinfully delicious! Congratulations, Susan, on your new nieces, and biggest and best wishes to the brand new mom and dad!
The kids put notes under the doors of their neighbors saying that they are running a penny drive. Then, on the appointed day, they stop by to pick up any pennies their neighbors would like to donate. It’s like the Girl Scout cookie drive: Knock knock. Who’s there? A cute little kid doing some good in the world.
After the epidural a nurse sat next to my bed the rest of the evening watching the baby's heartrate...the contractions were a little much for that darling....but she hung in there....I think she knew how important that VBAC was to me! After getting a little rest I told the Doctor that I was starting to feel pressure....I need to go to the bathroom. She giggled and checked me...10 cm. It was nearly morning and it was time.
Being either the kindly sort or easily cowed into following the herd, the four travelers strike out into the marsh to find the lost girl. Elise’s trail finally dead ends in a clearing scattered with errant’s bloom, a wild gray-white blossom. While Callimachi scours the ground for a sign of the girl’s passing, a spine-chilling scream echoes through the night. Gunderson and Calllimachi think the voice must be that of poor Elise, but Grift and Solis detect an inhuman quality to its timbre.
Make no mistake about it, these guys want to start for one reason and one reason only – money. Maybe they are just personally selfish guys or maybe it’s an overall attitude that younger pitchers are taking around the league as a whole. I’ve noticed a few of the young Tampa Bay pitchers act like spoiled children on the mound at times. Apparently the $60 million over 5 years that Papelbon earned on the free agent market wasn’t enough. Whatever the reason the Red Sox desperately need to find someone to close out games and the fact that neither of these guys seem to want to step up is incredibly disappointing.
Mike Fisher would put Ottawa ahead for a third and last time with his second goal half way through the period making the score 3-2. Perhaps, a crushing goal like this would have doomed the Blueshirts Sunday. In this game however, the Rangers enjoyed a little bit of luck to go along with that grittiness of theirs.
Talk to me of your success, your failures
Again we are confronted with the question as to what it is that some women are seeking when they enter into relationships with black men, when a disproportionate number of such relationships are abusive.
Its a real treat to enjoy any of these.
1040 D-III/12/1989. “A Tribute to Keith Cleveland.” Introduction, Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. See Item C-2001(4), above, pp. 311-15. See, also, Item D-XI/19/2000, below.
And as a sprint fan I would love to see Europe get back into the sprint mix. The continent hasn’t had a legitimate medal threat in the 200 since 2004 when Kostas Kenteris (GRE) and Francis Obikwelu (POR) were at their peaks. It’s been nearly a decade since Europe has had a sub 20 sprinter – Kostas Kenteris running 19.85 back in 2002. And prior to Kenteris winning gold in Sydney (‘00, 20.09) you have to go back to 1993 to find a European 200 medalist in a Major – Great Britain’s John Regis winning silver in Stuttgart at 19.94.
and on thursday last week, she threw an awesome burlesque party at czar on florida road, durban.
He was also very cautious to start with, dipping one finger in gingerly to spread the paint. After a while I put my hand in his paint and pushed it across the page. His whole attitude changed at this point and his face lit up!
Dream Job?: Photographer
Once confirmed in this course of action (perpetual virginity) no one, not even the husband, could ever contest it.
Stout update, 02/15 - Tasted the imperial stout this evening... While it's not as boozy (yet) as we'd predicted, it's incredibly smooth. A nice banana type aroma. Plenty of balance, no bitterness at all. Another tasty brew! Looking forward to a little more carbonation over the next week or so. Pics to follow....
I'm tired of being told I must lower my living standard to fight global warming, which no one is allowed to debate. My wife and I live in a two-bedroom apartment and carpool together five miles to our jobs. We also own a three-bedroom condo where our daughter and granddaughter live. Our carbon footprint is about 5% of Al Gore's, and if you're greener than Gore, you're green enough.
The speedy gleams the darkness swallow'd:
You know it’s funny how things never turn out the way you had them planned
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
But then, what else should we expect from a government who’s every action benefits large corporate interests over anyone and everyone else. And the way things are going, when these corporations do create these idea swiping mills, they’ll likely be staffed overseas by people making 50 cents a day.
Great sadness has come to our house. Yesterday, April 30th, we unexpectedly lost our Wonderdog. She died suddenly of congestive heart failure. We didn't even know she had it. Never sick, never slowed down. She had been occasionally doing this funny little breathing thing almost like an asthma attack and then she would be fine. I had her to the Vet in January and he listened to her lungs and heart and said 'just old dog's lungs'. Of course she didn't do the breathing thing in his office.
Character Believability: 4 Buffys
My adoption book arrived the other day and it came out amazing. I couldn’t be happier with the end product and it’s so amazing to see all my information laid out there in a book that I can pull out when I want to. The funny thing is, once I looked through it the first time, I put it away and haven’t looked at it since. I have this feeling of peace about everything. It’s amazing what putting all the pieces together did for me.
SFI IS ALREADY BECOMING INSTRUMENTAL
Here's a quick video of the spinning action (before the game was attached to the card):
produced and fashioned out of the raw material of ‘reality,’ and hence, is neither real in itself, as representation and artifice, but only through its dependent relationship to what it is not--that which it represents. Its reality and value is exactly that of the commodity.
The oatmeal prawns were extremely fresh and huge as shown in the beginning of the post. They were so crunchy that I would eat them with the shell on! The prawn heads were a bit too hard to eat them whole, so I just sucked the yummy stuff out of the head. Crabs were cooked with duck egg yolk sauce, which is one of my preferred way of cooking them. I’ve had better egg yolk crabs before but they were as amazing as the prawns. Kangkung or water convolvulus is best stir fried with dried fermented shrimp paste called belacan and SPOA did them very well. Last but not least, the clams that locals call la-la was made with a spicy sauce that was finger licking good.
Backpack Hitch Hiker #2: Forms.
This weekend I begged, pleaded and yes demanded pics for the Christmas card.
(She sits and stares until she can feel the paint dry. Then she sits and stares some more.)
Friday evening after dinner, my husband seemed to be asleep sitting up in his hospital bed, but his demeanor was strange. I ignored it for a little while, but when it didn’t change, I was sure something was wrong. I called Hospice and described what I saw, and the nurse instructed me to call 911.
Footloose - Skye (Kenny Loggins N’84)
More than half of the heart attack and strokes in the study occurred in women and 30% in people younger than 50.
What’s next for you? You’ve been in movies and TV, what’s next on your list, directing?
Despite knowing what holds me back from the kind of love and partnership I want, I find myself unable to make the changes that would allow this. At least not fast enough. And the irony is that these very issues are the ones my last potential partner could least deal with because of his issues, which in turn were the last I could deal with.
So I’ll just count what has a commercial label on it, and call that the count for today. Keep in mind that the basement is what I’m “Saving for a later date”. The drinking beer is in the fridge upstairs and in the Keezer in kegs.
Not contributing to the home financially! That makes my blood boil. When you leave the workforce to work at home, it is your job to manage the home with the money available to you. What is careful shopping for bargains, meal planning, stockpiling, making green cleaners, baking bread, making soap, cooking from scratch, recycling, mending, buying in bulk, caring for children? What are all these things if not contributing to the financial viability of the home? There is more than one way to contribute. Homemakers work as part of a team - there is a homemaker and a breadwinner. Both equally important. They can be a male homemaker and female breadwinner, or the other way around, they can be the same sex. One makes the money, the other uses it wisely to care for the family and pay the bills. If we don't value these partnerships of one breadwinner and one homemaker or two breadwinners who are part-time homemakers, then we lose out as a society. Our countries are populated by families with children who raise those children to take on the role of breadwinners and homemakers when it comes to be their time. We are not a solely a commercial enterprise. We are not working primarily to keep the country going, although that is a valuable side benefit, we're working to provide a good life for our families. We have a human component that is vital and without it we fail - morally and commercially.
p116-7 “Superhero science has taught me this: Entire universes fit comfortably inside our skulls. Not just one or two but endless universes can be packed inside our skulls. Not just one or two but endless universes can be packed into that dark, wet, and bony hollow without breaking it open from inside. The space in our heads will stretch to accommodate them all. The real doorway to the fifth dimension was always right here. Inside. That infinite interior space contains all the divine, the alien, and the unworldly we’ll ever need.
we sift numbly
Great News
Up until 2009, I would have counted Raider in the top pile of author solutions services, but there persists rough corners that are not being rounded, and since 2009, communication and publication deadlines are becoming more of a concern for me. They need to improve their book layout and options available on finished books, and make the final PDF files which authors are actually paying for available to the authors on contract termination. This still has not happened. [as of 2012 - nothing seems to be changing]
Jaoui and Bacri have a following, and more than a million French people went to see Let’s Talk About the Rain in the month following its release. In it, Jaoui plays the lead role of Agathe Villanova, a 40-ish French writer and feminist who returns to southern France a year after her mother’s death to sort out family business and launch her political campaign for the regional elections.
dogma: “a positive, arrogant assertion of opinion.” (One of several definitions, and it is not implied that dogmas must always be religious in nature.)
One year ago today, a seed was planted.
As an example of 5 and 6: Swiss corporation Hoffman-La-Roche has a significant operation in New Jersey. It will pay no corporate taxes and it will pay no property taxes for its facilities in Nutley. The dividends it pays to investors will be un-affected by this provision. On the other hand, dividends from General Motors, nominally a U.S. corporation but which is absent from New Jersey and has shown a marked tendency to outsource its production outside the United States, will be taxed at 50% after U.S. tax.
Level 3: MP Cost: 50, Damage: 199%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 6 times, 13% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
We will be back on 5th November with a new challenge and the results of the Door Hanger challenge - take care and see you soon
having him sealed in something though it is not
If you ain’t here I just can’t breathe
I declare in the Name
second. Paciorek came around to score on a triple by catcher John Bateman.
It's all good fun yet true. I don’t know about other writers, but most of my stories and books – or scenes in books or characters have been sparked by something specific and it’s usually the oddest little thing.
Still the company is straight about it. The auditor did not give them a "going concern statement" which surprised me. But the company disclosed the problems anyway. Here is the disclosure from the 10K.
Partials will return, but not for a while. Through December, it's all about Saturnalia.
No teachers
But, no time to be nostalgic. There was serious shopping to be done.
“She was also considered the most stylish woman in the world,” said Loring. “She was the supermodel fashion plate – fashion arbiter of the universe.”
Oath of Allegiance to The United States of America
Go!
as you wait in your wing back chair.
The NYCLU is building evidence that the NYPD’s over-reliance on broken windows policing not only places far too many New Yorkers into the criminal justice system but also has negative effects on public safety. We are currently surveying thousands of New Yorkers to find out what effects broken windows policing has on their lives.
I grew up in my families pest control business with my father and grandfather. My Grandfather started his career as a chemist and an accountant and realized the public need for effective pest control products. My grandfather, Lowell Christman developed these products and sold them retail. Shortly after the retail store opened his customers requested that he come to their residents and apply the products for them. In 1936 The Ohio Exterminating Co., Inc. was established as both a pest control product retail outlet and a service company.
So Yvette and I set out for Toledo Bend and Patroon Bay.
That the hands of the sisters Death and Night incessantly softly wash
Some people find it difficult to apply polishes on their nails, especially when they are using their non dominant hand. However, with a little practice, you can definitely get the hang of it. Try to use these tips the next time you are planning to do your nails. This will definitely save you a lot of money in the long run. Have fun and enjoy your nail adventure!
The last time all seven of us were together at the same time was at my youngest daughter's HS graduation party in 1999. It was our mother's wish that she could see all of her children together at the same time before she died. It worked out that everyone was able to come for the party and make our Mom's wish come true. Three months later she passed away. Rich didn't make it home that time.
But that could change. In exchange for the opportunity to buy herself out, Kate agrees to take a fall. She'll screw over her own client, the Leprekaner People's Liberation Alliance, as it attempts to destroy the Fundamentalist Militia of the Trolls. The ensuing fiasco will allow her firm to disband its underperforming Earth practice group, and let Kate go for gross malpractice. Everyone wins--except the leprechauns.
But Bersih Sarawak chairman Awang Abdillah Awang Nassar said it was not necessary.
I am prejudiced against the ethnic cleansing of our people from England.
Wei’s face lit up like a lantern.
I thought that the booths were packed in more densely than a show in America. The aisles felt claustrophobic. I think a US Fire Marshal would have a fit if she observed the way Thailand arranges its shows.
Well, the movie is awesome. It rocks. I laughed all the way through it. It's funny. It's also satirical, poking gentle but firm fun at the whole UFO and alien subculture.
She said the council had the right and responsibility to correct or refute her remarks, but it should not prosecute her.
We are also pleased to announce we have received restocks on white and grey mulberry paper. We have been working with one of our manufacturers for the last several weeks reviewing samples, testing colors and thicknesses. I told you've I've been busy - LOL. You will start seeing some changes in our color selection, and thickness availability. The quality of the paper is SUPERB, by far the most impressive I have worked with to this date.
foundation of
Timea Nagy knows what it’s like to be sold like a piece of meat.
Zara is at the center of an impending apocalypse. True, she’s successfully rescued Nick from Valhalla, but it simply isn’t enough. Evil pixies are ravaging Bedford, and they need much more than one great warrior; they need an army. Zara isn’t sure what her role is anymore. She’s not just fighting for her friends; she’s also a pixie queen. And to align her team of pixies with the humans she loves will be one of her greatest battles yet. Especially since she can’t even reconcile her growing feelings for her pixie king . . .
I am up for re-election after representing New Brighton since 2008. In those four years, I feel I have achieved a lot locally and done my bit to improve New Brighton through an enormous period of change. I’ve supported local residents and businesses, helped hundreds of people with issues that concern and affect their lives and learned a hell of a lot.
Pages: 309
Mieville takes on Sci-Fi head on, but just how will he make it his own? We all know he can't help himself from integrating styles so we shall see what the modern master has up his sleeve this time.
"You must have had some doubt.
Not really, I usually just go by their actions rather then what they say
So I switch to a napkin that’s clean.
Masonry - (continue developing the occupations
1 couple
2A. McLuhan the Man – TEL 236
You know when timing seems to work out great for an idea or blog? Well, that is me and that is now. I am obsessed with this book series by Janette Oke called the Canadian West Series. Truthfully, these books were not written for people my age. I am basing this off the fact that my sister read them when she was 10! I know, I am 31, what am I doing reading these books for 10 year olds?! But seriously, they relax me before bed.
_____I know I have been on Facebook for way to long now, I just received an e-mail and instead of looking for the "Reply" button, I found myself looking for a "Like" button. :-/ (funny Facebooking)
The artist has been making waves ever since he released his first single “Back When” featured one of the best rappers in Nigeria “Naeto C” before he recently featured in Sauce Kid’s Single titled Carolina which gives him the opportunity to diverts Sauce Kid’s fans to love him..
Dear K,
Sometimes I am a fountain of creativity and motivation. A lot of times however... I'm... um... not. I'd like to apologize for my absence here lately. I've been with you in thought, for sure. I've got some great stuff planned for my blog, and almost all of it is coming out of the planning stage and getting oh-so-close to seeing the light of day. I'm sure you'll like it.
Second series of questions: for what is there suffering?--and from this a conclusion is derived concerning the relation of the true world to our apparent, changing, suffering, contradictory world: (1) Suffering as a consequence of error: how is error possible? (2) Suffering as a consequence of guilt: how is guilt possible? (--experiences derived from nature or society universalized and projected to the sphere of "in-itself"). If, however, the conditioned world is causally conditioned by the unconditioned world, then freedom to err and incur guilt must also be conditioned by it: and again one asks, what for?--The world of appearance, becoming, contradiction, suffering, is therefore willed: what for?
MILITARY NECESSITY: Military necessity, along with distinction, and proportionality, are three important principles of international humanitarian law governing the legal use of force in an armed conflict.
Steve: "Huh?"
People always talk about how difficult this recipe is, but I think if you take my advice on #3 it's actually quite straightforward. You also need to make sure you've got the correct sized rammekins, and some single ovenproof dishes (like the ones shown in the recipe) to bake them in the 2nd time.
Small arms attacks left six people dead and six injured while a notable rise in the number of indirect fire attacks (rockets and mortars) also left five people dead and 22 injured.
The Eighth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution provides: “Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted.” Attempts were made to abolish the Death Penalty through the Supreme Court by asking them to declare it “cruel and unusual” per se. In Furman v Georgia (1972), the Court, in a 5-4 decision, (with the four Nixon appointees dissenting), ruled the Death Penalty unconstitutional, when applied in a discriminatory manner. A new conservative majority however came back in 1976 and declared Capital Punishment was not in and of itself unconstitutional.
I also remembered a similar story ~ one day when we were in Jake's library (way back ~ when he was much younger!), I was talking with the young woman who was doing the children's programs as she was at her desk, cutting things out and gluing things for her program. I said to her (and sincerely meant it!), "*I* want a job where I get paid for playing with paper and scissors and glue!!!"
What do you think keeps people meditating?
Msa l’khir. Good evening. Permit me to introduce myself. My name is Hassan. I am a storyteller, monarch of a realm vaster than any you can envisage, that of the imagination. My memory is not what it used to be, but if we can settle on a democratic price, I will tell you a tale the like of which I promise you have never heard before. It is a love story, like all the best stories, but it is also a mystery, for it concerns the disappearance of one of the lovers or the other, or perhaps both of them or neither. It happened two years ago, or it might have been five or ten or twenty-five. These details are unimportant.
4. Have fiarth that your followers will rally & show their crafty love out to those you awarded.
SPIT ROASTED CHICKEN:
Dr. Morse served as a Research Fellow for Stanford University’s Hoover Institution from 1997-2005. She received her Ph.D. in economics from the University of Rochester in 1980 and spent a postdoctoral year at the University of Chicago during 1979-80. She taught economics at Yale University and George Mason University for 15 years. She was John M. Olin visiting scholar at the Cornell Law School in fall 1993. She is a regular contributor to the National Review Online, National Catholic Register, Town Hall, MercatorNet and To the Source.
He flipped over the paper with the tournament schedule and began to sketch it out:
"Henry James" was compiled on the psychedelic compilation album "Nightmares At Toby's Shop", and the sleevenotes incorrectly state that he "killed himself some time ago". In actual fact, Stott's demise was not a result of suicide, and involved an unfortunate motorcycle accident in Precot in 1977.
6. To use the same angle as last time, what might this opening tell us to watch out for in the rest of the novel? For one, there is an appropriation and re-deployment of genre here, particularly crime/noir. That it has been transplanted into the world of adolescence is telling, but it’s too soon to say more about what Murakami might be up to with this.
We strolled through the Champ de Mars, then exited to the east, hoping to reach the Rodin Museum before closing. Despite the specific destination in mind, John was willing to patiently pose for more self-portraits.
Winners will be announced during the SFWA’s 47th annual Nebula Awards Weekend, May 17-20, in Arlington, Va., where Connie Willis will receive the 2011 Damon Knight Grand Master Award for her lifetime contributions and achievements.
they were at their peak of popularity.
Which, I did.
Thanks for popping by...leave a little love,
4. Calvin Klein Spring 2012 Lacquer Silk/Metal Satin Fluted Skirt: I love everything about this skirt, from its glistening shine to its form-skimming shape with a gentle, champagne-fluted hemline. It’s a classic style that is well worth the investment and will keep you mixing and matching for years to come. The delicate silk/satin fabric will feel luxurious against your skin and won’t compete for attention with the glamorous corset.
This skirt is available for Custom Order Only
As you might recall, during the passage, Chloe got to a point where she began feeling human. She was stretched out on one of the dinette benches, crosswise to the boat's motion. Part of what helped her is finding a jug of juice on the floor under the table. She began drinking that. Up in the cockpit, we were aware that she was getting fluids, but didn't really understand how much juice she'd consumed until she popped up in the companionway with the nearly empty jug. The child was positively giddy on a sugar high. I asked her to share the remaining juice with Marjie, and she began teaching Marjie how to wrap her lips around the mouth of the jug so as to prevent sloppage when the boat moved. She made perfectly ridiculous "O" shapes with her mouth that had us -- even poor Marjie -- cracking up. It was a most welcome moment of hilarity after a grim couple of days. Weeks later, Chloe still remembers the necessary "O" and still gets a chuckle when she demonstrates it.
Did I mention I love it?? It was a quick and easy install, but the whole project took me a week. Surprised? No? :)
Spices - to go with lamb/goat
And even if there was water, no bathroom fixtures. No indoor plumbing.
I am astounded to have reached 500 'liker's on Facebook!!!!!
The old town by the Cathedral is beautiful and full of history: Drury Lane theatres are not only in London; the Bull Ring not only in Birmingham. So there is more to Wakefield than rhubarb – and actually the infamous rhubarb festival is only six years old. But if you do decide as a town to brand yourself on rhubarb, surely the coffee shops and tea rooms should be getting in on the act: why didn’t I see any rhubarb tart, rhubarb crumble or even rhubarb cake to have with my cuppa?
So probably Dad went for good.
Now I am not opposed to dancing, I myself love to dance, but I also know to keep it out of the way of everyone else and what I am good at and what I can not do. I do not think I am the next coming of Nicole Scherzinger nor will I try to be. I don't pop, lock, and drop it when I am not in a club, I think this is something we all need to remember. I am all for having fun but I am not all for people embarrassing themselves, ok that's a lie I totally am, but if it's in my way I am so not.
From 4:30-5:30 PM at the Tifton-Tift County Public Library, the Georgia Humanities Council will provide a workshop on Shakespearean stagecraft. Participants should be between the ages of 7 and 18. Things that will be covered include costuming, acting, sword-fighting, life in 1611 England, and the Globe Theater.
A Phalaenopsis, or "Moth Orchid." Phalaen from the French for "moth," which also oddly enough coincides with Penny-- Papillon is French for "butterfly," which their upright ears and long silken fur imitate. When Papillon's ears droop instead of stand upright the dog is called a Phalaen, or 'moth' instead of a Papillon.
The problem was, I missed my laptop.
They may seem like friendly members of the family but cats can be ferocious hunters and a threat to native animals.
The town was a center of activity during both the Revolutionary and Civil Wars, although no significant battles took place there. Trenches were dug on the property of the Weems-Botts Museum during the Civil War, and many soldiers from both the North and the South passed through here. The house was likely used by officers during this period; it probably was not used as a field hospital, although the Henderson House up the street was. Approximately 9000 Civil War soldiers are buried in unmarked graves in the area around the museum and under the nearby interstate. These soldiers died while camped on and around the property, mainly due to measles; they were all Confederate and hailed mostly from Alabama, Georgia, and Texas.
According to Wikipedia, “A typical species becomes extinct within 10 million years of its first appearance although some species, called living fossils survive virtually unchanged for hundreds of millions of years. Most extinctions have occurred naturally, prior to Homo sapiens walking on Earth: it is estimated that 99.9% of all species that have ever existed are now extinct.”
But he is learning. When he wakes up early in the night, he's pretty good about falling back asleep with us. On top of me if the Pumpkin is cuddled next to me, because he's such a mama's boy he has to be close to me.
JoAnn over at Ostriches Look Funny had the greatest post today that really has me thinking. This week has been trying and there has been more than one or two times when I have wanted to throw my hands up... or go back to bed... or run out the front door. And I beat myself up mercilessly for it. "God has blessed me with these beautiful children. How dare I not be joyful in every moment." But as JoAnn helped me to remember, and perhaps I can remind you on one of your hard days, being a Christian doesn't mean being a stepford mom, it means being a mom who chooses to bask in His grace. We are forgiven for a reason... because we need it.
Workbox/File 6:VideoText Algebra Worksheet, 15 minutes
In Sandra Laing’s case a documentary was filmed in the 1970s. Before that time there were numerous newspaper and magazine articles about this incident. In 2004 Judith Stone’s book, When She Was White, made its appearance. Now there’s a forcefully promoted block-buster movie showing on our big screens, and we’re already in the year 2010! How many more times are we going to be reminded about the idiocy of the Whiteman’s past?
I woke early and laid thinking about the long night of short dreams that woke me. Three of which were simply hearing her voice, telling me something. With each one I remember thinking “I wonder if she is there in her bed telling me something from her deepest heart and our bond is actually strong enough for me to receive it from 2,000 miles away.” That’s a crazy thing to consider, but the tired mind can do crazy things. Then, a message on my phone and I feel the development of a large lump in my throat that almost prevents swallowing. I get up from my bed and drive to the gas station to get a coffee and I can’t find my sunglasses to cover the evident pain in my eyes so I went to the drive through to avoid going inside.
The Ipcress File was first published in hardback in Great Britain by Hodder & Stoughton in 1962, and is Deighton's debut novel as well as the first to star his nameless spy. The copy seen here, however, isn't the true first, i.e. a first impression. First impressions of the book – which had a relatively small initial print run of, I believe, 2,500 – go for anything from £600 to over £1,000. Mine is the second impression, published in the same year as the true first (which was published in November of 1962), but identifiable as a second printing by the copyright line and the fact that it carries a couple of reviews on the dustjacket front flap, which are absent on the first impression:
SEAN: Sandals. I like my feet to breath.
Little work done during the day as the youngest was sick, seemed like a whole day at the doctors then the pharmacy. Better get caught up on the contract work I took on.
Regardless, I will be canning plums on Saturday. One of our neighbors has two golden plum trees that are loaded with fruit and she said "come and get 'em"! Wow. You don't have to tell me twice, I'm on it!
The president summoned congressional leaders to the White House Saturday after House Speaker John Boehner announced Friday night he was pulling out of the debt-ceiling negotiations with the Obama administration.
But this year RBG workers are trying a different approach. They’re erecting a 100-metre wide turtle barrier beside Cootes Drive. They hope when turtles encounter the wall, they’ll turn right, and keep walking until they come upon Spencer Creek. From there they should take a left, go under the roadway bridge to get to the other side and therefore avoid having to go on the Cootes Drive.
This week is HSSH's birthday. I've tried to teach my children the principle of honoring their father. Even when he doesn't deserve it.
We go live on Monday the 19th. Hope to see you there.
With all those newbies visiting, one wonders how they get here.
Designed by Lisa Silver
Where do you live?
Before 3121, this was considered his comeback album, the one that made him a household name again. More soul than pop, it reached number five in the US, a charting Prince hadn’t seen in years.
Children of Men (2006) as Jasper
We mixed it with another tiny flower that butterflies adore, gold lantana (Lantana camara 'New Gold'). We like this lantana because even though some varieties of L. camara are found on the invasive lists, 'New Gold' is considered sterile and doesn't spread beyond where you plant it.
IPRs can be attached to writings or products regarded as dangerous or immoral, and IPRs tend to legitimize such works by implying social approval. Societies must decide whether to provide protection for harmful or otherwise objectionable work. New technologies, particularly those that create or replicate life, often trigger debate over whether the work should be done at all, much less be protected by law. IPRs also establish ownership of particular innovations, which may help to determine liability if a product causes harm. This raises questions of whether innovators should be held responsible for their products, particularly when the products are used in unintended ways.
ALL MEMEBERS WALKED AWAY BREATHING.
o Despite that small size, in both terms of population and economic output, Greece already has received a bailout of about $150 billion (actual amount fluctuates with the exchange rate).
However, I am so touched to be asked and the goodies are just too irresistible, that you couldn't stop me from ripping open the packaging and begin crafting straight away. And this weekend, that is exactly what I did. The first project is nearly done. I just want to tweak it a smidgeon and then it'll be ready to post later in the week.
My world building desire conflicted with it and I felt that I needed where a dungeon was going before I made the dungeon and of course to properly place the where in a world was a great and wonderful thing. Of course with out anything to keep me even keel on such a "world spanning" project I barely managed to get anywhere.
get Mitt Romney to change his mind?
They are on my list because they are all highly acclaimed authors whose works are commonly read in realms of higher learning.
Simon: I don't have any nicknames for any of the implements that my Mistress uses on me. I think it's a good idea though, at the moment there can be some confusion when she says "hand me the strap" and I reply "erm which one Mistress?". If all the implements had names it would be a lot simpler. The only problem is that she has a lot of straps and canes and thinking up names for all of them might be problematic.
Its a PB&J sandwich cut into a circle for the leprechaun's face, the eyes are marshmallow and mini m&m's, the rosy cheeks are a freeze dried yogurt bites. His beard is cheddar cheese and his hat is a green apple. I also included a small amount of Lucky Charms cereal, 3 gold chocolate coins and a glass of green milk. I was inspired by Meet the Dubiens lunch although hers was healthier.
Pressure cook toor dhal and gram dhal separately alongwith turmeric powder.
As a reader, I enjoy sequels. Sometimes a book doesn’t need it, but often times we get involved with the characters, curious about where they’re headed or who they’ll meet along the way. This is where sequels are so great, because we never really have to part with our favorite characters. (Of course, this might lead to severe separation anxiety when it’s over, like me with Harry Potter…) Sequels help us to round out the character’s journey and hopefully give us closure on the story.
As of now, I don't know what the key is for, where it went, or how any of the above came to pass.
Books For Charity or Scam For Profit? (May 22): My personal favorite of my more journalistic stories, this post arose from some local concern about those big blue bins that offer to swallow up second-hand books for charity. I truly enjoyed digging up the truth and raising public awareness. This was also one of my most re-posted stories, which was very gratifying..
"Honeeyyyy!!!" V shouted and hugged me.
I am not quite sure what I am going to do with myself when January comes around, but one thing that is certain is that it will be different to what I have been used to. Before I get myself involved in anything whether paid or voluntary I intend to work my way through the list of jobs in the cottage that have been ignored or left undone over the last 18 months.
Today as I reflected on my week it took me back to Psalm 23 – again.
We haven’t got on the juice til’ we pass out.
The scope widens and the intensity deepens as the epic tale of sacrifice and survival begun in The Passage surges forward in this breathtaking sequel.
And don’t even get me started on girls! My fatal flaw could find a cute girl and direct my gaze to her in any environment! I could get a crush on the cutest nun in the convent! And thinking about them? My fatal flaw was in heaven over that. Because that could divert me from writing for hours! Weeks! Months!!
Add the hot veggies to the lentils in the bowl. The heat will help soften the lentils. Add the parsley, bread crumbs, flaxseed, Worcestershire sauce (or soy sauce and vinegar), and spices. In a separate little bowl or cup, put 2 Tbs. of chickpea flour. Add 2 Tbs. of water and mix into a loose paste. This will act as a binder. Add the flour and water mixture to the bowl.
Don't rush. Forget about seeing every-thing-on-your-list, don't worry if you don't get to see the latest exhibition, or if you can't have tea in the most fashionable tea salon.
At this time of the year, with the holidays upon us, we tend to become more aware of the people around us. We show more compassion, give more to charity, share a smile with strangers while out shopping. What if our daily perception was as keen throughout the year as it is during the adrenaline driven holiday season?
Really? Will they employ camp orchestras, cus I play the French horn?
Miriam is a fabulous instructor. She sprinkled in entertaining stories while explaining and demonstrating the important concepts that we needed to learn. When it was our turn for show time (aka our speeches), I was fascinated by the variety of topics being presented. From nutrients to muay thai and from magic shows to telecommunications, I think our small class of eight students covered it all in our numerous presentations. With each round of speeches, came group reminders and individual comments from Miriam. Taking in the constructive feedback that was provided to us helped make our next presentations easier and hopefully better.
Renuka also plans to make a movie in Hindi and cast her husband. She says, “I have two scripts ready one in Hindi and the other in Marathi. The Hindi script has my husband playing the most important role.”
selection of tequila and mescal, while also featuring the same type
Tuesday, 01 May 2012 13:44
- They will belief that “God will only love them when they perform for Him”.
( to be continued )
A blazer is nice to throw on this time of year, as a jacket. They usually have good pockets (always handy) and add a touch of class to whatever else I’m wearing. I’ve had a couple blazers that I purchased new, but I’ve also gotten a lot of good use out of some that have come to me in other ways.
The IPKat was hoping that this might have been one of those cases the importance of which was summarised in a Curia press release. As it is, the hour is late and the Kat has little to say, other than that the words “by means of their own facilities” appear to have been interpreted broadly and in terms that reflect commercial reality -- a mode of interpretation that national courts may wish to consider carefully when deciding how to determine the parameters of copyright.
ABV=5.109%
Look - he did a perfect sulky ear swish.
A beautiful place, a little hill town, perched on a rock in the Vaucluse department of Provence. A warren of stone houses, little alleyways and hidden cafes to discover. I found a bar where you could sit on a tiny balcony high up above the lower houses, looking out over the Provençal landscape, while swifts flew through the hot dry air. I spent a happy few hours there, a cold beer on the table and a sketchbook to hand... I would love to be there, right now, until then I shall have to make do with looking at my sketchbooks and making things like this painting.
14) The Ledbury (London, England)
Ashley is staying with her dad for now, until she finds an apartment, but we have offered for her to come back here if she wishes. It was so good to see her.
The bus stops.
02 Chant down babylon (Nonpalidede)
Well everybody has been there
Your weak heart shook with fright,Looking for your mom’s arm in the night.
The story itself goes far beyond the martial arts action depicted in the trailer though. According to Wikipedia, the film…
hengilas
of her and you can’t help it, can’t help but break
Always thinking of another
Is that crazy? Does that show how much I want to see it and how ANNOYED I am that it will take another TWO MONTHS to get here?
-Wala akong pakialam! 19%
Had a good sandwich and coffee at the Terra Breads Cafe in the Village at False Creek.
One thing to remember is that Return On Engagement (ROE) is not a numbers game; it’s a quality of interaction game. It’s not how many followers or community members you have that counts. It’s how well you do know one another? How likely are they to recommend you or to become evangelists for your organization? These are the returns you get from your engagement with your community. You’ll notice they differ from the typical Return On Investment types of measures you may be familiar with.
As they watched him.
Dies: JustRite Custom Nested Sentiment Dies, Spellbinders Labels 6, Pinking Circles
I know that all people aren’t meant to stay all of the time, some people come into our lives just as my Mr Kipling said ( I wrote a post on Features and Fixtures before, check it out) to serve a purpose and then to leave. I’ve gone past wishing this man would just do right by me, I’m nearly past wishing he’d do right by his son … I can’t make someone be a father… all I can do is be the best mother I can be and choose the best man to share mine and my sons life!
So, here’s the question: change your connectome, change your life—and how you perceive the world?
Here's my grandson helping me dry the stencilled ink...HINT (from my mistake...) ...use StazOn permanent ink or dry-brushed/dry-pounced acrylic paint!
There are a few things to point out from these verses. First, both male and female were created in the image of God. Neither of them, at the point of creation, was lesser or greater than the other. Second, both male and female were given the same twin mandate to be fruitful and to subdue the earth. This was intended to be a shared task.
Always Right is the highest-profile winner to date for stallion and racing quiz favourite Right Win, who holds the unique distinction of winning both a Group One on the Flat and a Grade One over jumps with victories for Richard Hannon in the Gran Premio d’Italia and the Tolworth Hurdle. Always Right won five of his six starts in point-to-points for his owner/trainer John Wade and made a winning debut under Rules as he powered to a 12-length success in a novices’ hunters’ chase at Perth in May, 2008. He failed to build on that effort in two appearances during the 2008/2009 campaign, falling in an Ayr hunters’ chase before trailing home 11th behind Cappa Bleu in the Christie’s Foxhunter Chase at the 2009 Cheltenham Festival. Always Right returned to action 12 months later, easily winning a Kelso hunters’ chase in March, 2010. He raced again at the Scottish track when second in a handicap chase in October of the same year and capturing a similar contest in February, 2011. Always Right provided Wade with the biggest success of his career to date at Doncaster the following month when he gamely repelled the challenge of Lothian Falcon for a head verdict in the Grimthorpe Chase. He also ran a superb race to take third, beaten a length in total, in the Grade Three Scottish Grand National at Ayr in April, 2011. Always Right continued his upward curve at the start of the current season as he stayed on to beat Skippers Brig in a Kelso handicap chase on December 4. He was stepped back up in class for the Grade Three Rowland Meyrick Handicap Chase at Wetherby on December 26, but failed to travel with any fluency and was pulled up with three fences left. Further disappointment followed in the Grade Three Betfred Grand National Trial at Haydock on February 18 when Always Right faded quickly and was pulled up approaching the second last fence. He was given a soft palate operation shortly after that race and connections are hopeful that he can return to form in the John Smith’s Grand National.
Apparently it could seem like a contradiction.. Or maybe this is meant to be like that, since this is creating the foundation of understanding (of the faith), and hence it can be sorted based on the importance of the two well-being, since studying this is part of the perfection of the soul, as he writes:
Roll out the pastry to line a tart tin or pie dish
with supple suede shoes
942 D-IV/24/1986. “Xenophon on Tyranny.” Memphis State University, Memphis, Tennessee.
“As we speak, more than 10
Today, I was thinking about Julie's slice again.
First things first, I have to come up with a business idea. We were asked last week to write a mission statement explaining our enterprise. Last week, I was still a little undecided about what I wanted to do, which I think is quite common for some people at this stage at university, but I did have a rough idea. There are many things I would like to do but after spending this morning in the Furnishing Fabrics department in John Lewis, I have definitely made up my mind! In fact, I am now really determined!
I want women’s rights to not be an issue. I think a woman has the right to choose what she does with her body just like a man. I think that people who want to control women are assholes. But I don’t think anything’s going to change until women learn how to treat each other right. If women tear each other down then whose to say that men can’t? I don’t think you can be a feminist and a mean girl, but hey, maybe that’s just me.
Death has no power over the victorious… the victory is His…this broken world is His… the lives of all the little children, deceased or no, are His.
If you don’t have a bank account then how are you depositing or cashing checks? Are you going to check cashing centers and giving them a portion of YOUR money to gain access to YOUR money? That doesn’t sound like the wisest of choices when you have a choice. Show me one millionaire or billionaire who doesn’t have a bank account. Show me one entrepreneur without a bank account. Show me. I’m sure you can’t.
First of all, I apologize for the crazy amount of posts this week- 2/day for a few days in a row, but I have lots to talk about!
When my little sugar lump awakes in the morning she tells me her eyes are broken and refuses to open them for a good while because she, unlike her older sister, loves to sleep.
Preheat your oven to 400 degrees. In a heavy soup pot or Dutch oven, melt butter over medium-low heat. Add your sliced onions and cook, covered, for about 20 minutes. Place the entire soup pot in the oven, with the lid slightly offset to allow the onions to brown. Cook the onions in the oven for 1 hour, stirring occasionally to prevent sticking and burning. Remove the pot from the oven and place it back on the burner. Add the wine before turning the heat back on. Stir in the wine, scraping off the brown bits from the bottom of the pan. Cook on medium for about 5 minutes (or until the wine is able to reduce). Add the beef and chicken broth, the Worcestershire Sauce and the minced garlic. Reduce the heat to low and simmer for about 40 minutes.
It's excerpt day! We post 300-350 words of our old stories.
Says Mr. Peck: "We write for a generation we never were because ours is a higher calling: a deeper craft", trying to woo "a readership whose facebooks glow hot into the night long after their parents are fast asleep".
09 As If It Always Happens
Here I was trying NOT to pick the penny up so that I could give someone else good luck, then the FIRST opportunity of adversity hits, I immediately wish I had taken the selfish route, and then I'm rewarded in the end??
The backing papers are from Dovecraft and I have used my spellbinders die to layer it all together as this die has a lacey effect to it.There are two different beautiful ribbons which I have layered together and a die cut heart from Marrianne Dies.
Its been awhile again since I last blogged. Just plain lazy .... :-/
University of Minnesota leaders are looking to tighten up the way departing executives are paid.
There are lunchtime queues, but not nearly as bad as those at Jamie’s Italian, but there’s also a large bar area in which to wait, or indeed, just dine on the pizzeria and mozzarella bar menu if waiting it out for pasta is not an option.
i always loved storms as a child. but in recent years, such weather stirrings haven’t prompted a new kind of fear in me. one of reverence and powerlessness. knowing people who have been struck by lightning and lived to tell about it. seeing communities around us be devastated by tornado winds. learning of floods, tsunamis, earthquakes, mudslides, and wind fires across our country and around the world–leaving countless heartaches in its wake–all these things have launched a new reverence for the mother nature side of God than i ever had as a child. and when those clouds and wind brew near me–i wonder–is this the day i lose it all? is this a day of storms that will alter the course of my life for eternity? and again the questions–did I speak truth while here? did i speak to others from my own heart or that of God’s? were my words and actions blasphemous?
2. Melt chocolate and butter in saucepan over low heat, stirring
If you have watched this movie and thought “should I really be laughing at this type of subject?” Yes you should is the answer. I thought exactly the same first time around of watching. The first time I didn’t really have my laughter head on, I always said I would give it another go at some point and boy I’m glad that I did.
Cam and the legions of angels and Outcasts are desperate to catch Luce, but none are as frantic as Daniel. He chases Luce through their shared pasts, terrified of what might happen if she rewrites history.
I cannot falsify
One issue I have with meatballs is that since I have started to cut the gluten, I haven't found a good substitute for bread or breadcrumbs. I hate the taste of rice breadcrumbs. Nut meals haven't been much improvement either. Paleo eaters just leave it out. I don't think the elimination of bread was detrimental to the taste or consistency of my meatballs.
Now adhere the top cover to the base you’ve already created then add more gaffer tape to the spine giving your book its binding.
Professional welders breathe truly toxic fumes while performing their jobs every single day, but unlike secondhand smoke, the toxins to which these workers are exposed really can kill in hours! They still choose to show up for work EVERYDAY. Apparently, according to Tobacco Control logic, breathing nickle and chromium smoke is OK, but second hand smoke however, is simply crossing the line of good judgment.
There are 20 instructions in your envelope – take them out one at a time over the next 2 hours – some of the instructions will take 10 minutes to complete, others can go on for the rest of the walk. You don’t have to complete one instruction before you pick another – it’s good to combine them.
This is basically meeting somewhere together to do a major holiday achievement that takes more than one player. Some examples are:
Today, I’d like to share a running club which would be referred to as a running family. The name of the group is the OK-OK Runners and they’re based out of Metro Manila in the Philippines.
Heat the oil for deepfrying, take a small golf ball size vada batter and flatten them with ur palms, drop gently to the hot oil and fry until they turns golden brown and crispy, drain the excess of oil with paper towel.
What do you think? This case has aroused a fair amount of controversy in legal circles. We would love to know where would you draw the line.
Place in ice cream mixer/freezer with ice on the outside and run until it thickens. Ice cream will be soft. Place in freezer for 1-2 hours to harden.
Nurse Jackie
“Everything’s been hurting for nearly a month. I swear, my joints are aching. My appetite is gone but I’m always starving.”
Hey! Hey! Hey!
When we say, as we should often feel the temptation to do, that the Labour administration that has governed us for the past 11 years is incompetent, we should be aware also that we are saying the following: that, but for its administrative and technical failings, it would have done well.
Obviously I haven't written a blog in nearly 2 months now, and I do apologize for that. First I went through a little struggle with writer's block, and then about 3 weeks ago my husband and I separated. Needless to say my humor level has been a little low. So today's blog probably won't make you laugh, but I feel the need to write.
Sir Vic – Keep up the good work Sir Vic, and I’ll see you again in the field.
Please, for the love of eating choices, please, stop using meat dishes as gauges for how "good" a restaurant's food is. PLEASE! I am BEGGING you on bended knees with clasped hands and tears in my eyes!!!!!
Selon Matthieu is available on DVD, but not with English subtitles. There's a nice, French DVD (R2, PAL) with an anamorphic, widescreen print. This is also available in France as a 2-disc set with another of Beauvois' films, Le Petit lieutenant - the Selon Matthieu disc is the same as the one that's sold seperately. There's a healthy number of extras included in the set, but they're all for the Le Petit lieutenant, not Selon Matthieu.
I’ll just search through my intellect,
here are some highlights.... mostly centered around what we ate and Ady's time at American Girl.
of easy & fair surfaces along the general paths
He knew how much her beliefs were ingrained into her, and he didn’t want to upset her. She wasn’t ready for this…yet. But Suzanne’s curiosity was getting the better of her.
Isn’t it a lovely ride
Constellations unravelled luxuriously under the gold of candles spread on the polychrome marble floor.
To Wong Foo...
The series won't be out until next week, but the author, Kimberly Gallagher, is stirring up interest by releasing a little information, and a fun activity each day to go along with the first book - featuring Viola.
Well i rose to the challenge and fell to earth with a bump. I tried my best but this was the best i came up with. I think they are awful my no 1 son thinks they are cool and my oh said it's alright. lol
“I therefore got in touch with the local services of Alzheimer Scotland and set the ball rolling.” Setting up the group was a challenge for Tamasine and her partners when they hit countless barriers and when their volunteer singing leader suddenly passed away, they came close to giving up. Just then an offer of funding came through from an NHS endowment and this allowed the recruitment of Community Musician Dr. Jane Bentley, who has extensive experience in working with people who have no musical knowledge and also people with dementia. And so nine months later, in September 2010 the first ‘Singing for the Brain Renfrewshire’ session took place. This ran for ten weeks, every Tuesday night from 7.00 to 8.30pm in the Mental Health Day Hospital in Paisley’s RAH. “From the outset we received tremendous support” said Tamasine. “Attendance during this pilot programme was much better than expected, even in bad weather. It continues to develop, flourish and surprise us. As an occupational therapist, I strongly believe that engaging in meaningful activity is beneficial for mental and physical well-being. This is particularly the case for people with dementia who are struggling to maintain everyday skills at home and who are facing stigma and social isolation. Carers are frequently stressed and exhausted by the increasing demands on their time and energy, and frustrated by diminishing support services. Attending the group each week gives people something to look forward to. People are often able to sing, even after they stop speaking. It’s amazing to see people ‘come alive’ as the group progresses; rather like watering wilted flowers. Jane has a remarkable talent for putting people at ease and working with the group, wherever it leads her. No-one has to explain themselves or worry that their relative might do something ‘embarrassing’.”
In October 2009, women comprised 49.99% of the workforce, a breath of a hair of an itty bitty thread away from being half of Americans in the workforce. Part of this illusory equality was brought on by the gendered nature of the industries overwhelmingly affected by the recession in the first place. As the recession plodded along, the jobs in traditionally male industries like construction didn’t return, and unemployment benefits started to run out. And we now appear to be moving away from gender parity once again; threatened with impending expiration of any form of aid or income, some men did the unthinkable— debase themselves enough to work women’s jobs like- gasp!- retail.
He had to wait some more years
These windows overlook my realm: Garden, pool, Woodland House.
I wish you were here (I wish you were)
1 ancestors
3. Garlic, 3 cloves.
. . . gives me a voice.
And since the Bitch is choked and inarticulate with the weight of all this, the two Furies drop her, and jump impatiently away towards the next victim emerging from Heal's.
To say he was excited was an understatement. And yes, he insisted on bringing his new duck and his lovie in with him, which made me disinfect the entire cart with a sanitizing wipe :::shudder::: Anyway, all through the store, Sweets was full of "bbbbbbbs!" and directives of "more driving!" For the first time ever, he did not want to leave!
Witness the pristine bloodroot, so innocent and cheerful it hides the darker truth of the poison that lies beneath the ground’s surface (see bloodroot image in The Springiest Spring post). At the bend in the creek, and again on the other side near the boardwalk wetland are Jack in the Pulpit offerings. Every year I hunt these down like an endangered species in a swamp, the Ivory billed woodpecker of my two acre Eden, never where they were the year before, always shifting surprisingly from the previous year’s position, elusive. Last year I’m peering under and between plants searching, searching for a Jack, which I’m guessing should be about six inches tall, looking for the familiar shape of the pitcher, striated with maroon vertical lines when I stand up to stretch my back and see right smack in front of my face a hooded pitcher about 18 inches off the ground and just as plain as could be, a good seven inches of creamy green doffing its cap, massive in comparison to the specimens in years past. Viola. Sometimes not looking is the best way to see something.
You bunkin up with me tonight, Gaga - when a little cunt came up behind us and snatched her bag with all her jubes in it...
I’m going to start guessing 100,000 ahead instead of 50,000 ahead.
Of course the first point is that not everyone has those choices. Certainly they're a privilege accorded only to those living in comparatively wealthy countries and to those not hindered by ill health or extreme poverty.
Because of my election campaign, I can’t upload my photos from Iceland until after the elections. So, just for now I will be showing you one photograph from Iceland. The rest will wait until after the elections on May 3rd.
After letting them little heart shaped breads soak in the mixture, we “buttered” up the pan and cooked them on each side for a few minutes. I topped them with some raspberries (was out of strawberries), spread some of the strawberry butter on them and voila, breakfast!
indicates that seven children will come together, and this book ends with only five having been found, so there is probably another book on the way.
~hubby and i marked our 10 year anniversary (together for 10, married for 5)
Type: Sea Serpent/Xyz/Effect
Ella got to meet Bunny too! She was actually a stowaway in the car, as her puppy-sitter canceled at the last minute. Ella was spied towards the end of the visit, and Bunny and John, being the dog-lovers that they are, told us that we should have brought her in!
Remember seeing friends getting places without even slightly scratched or hurt the way you did. And you keep asking yourself, why me?
• CIPA Guide to the Patents Acts (7th edition), composed by a team of authors on behalf of the Chartered Institute of Patent Attorneys, published by Sweet & Maxwell. This is the most recent edition of a standard reference work for patent practitioners. It contains section-by-section references to relevant United Kingdom and European Patent Office case law. Further details available from the publisher's website here.
It’s hard to describe the style of writing. Because of the casualness of the way the story ebbs and flows, it doesn’t feel like a novel. It is more a voyeuristic read through someone’s diary, which I found really refreshing.
Which other Asian authors would you recommend people MUST run out and buy right now this second, well once they have finished reading this?
6.) Brother Throwing Everyone Out - This guy might be a paranoid-schizo or he might just have the confidence of 100 brothers behind him. But either way if he doesn’t recognize you and you don’t have tits/ass then you are definitely getting thrown the fuck out. He has been known to even throw a pledge or two out because his laptop probably got stolen a week ago.
And they flew down a mightier force at night,
Her melons jiggle as she
-include your full name, valid email and cell phone number.
Yeah. Right.
And the more I think about it, the more I realize I don’t have time to worry. I’ve worked too hard to let that stand in my way. I may be nervous about what’s coming next, but I won’t let that stop me.
So that's the first border done, more or less. A bit of mulching later on if there's enough compost
Being human, I have committed Loshon Hora, otherwise known as gossip. At times, it’s come back to haunt me. I’m sure everyone has had the same experience.
I’m going to keep this site open as a more personal outlet so I hope you continue to follow me, especially if you consider yourself a friend. But the other site will be for everyone and we hope it proves to be entertaining, informative and exciting.
I found this challenge to play along in:
Our culture is still amenable to the elites but our manipulated young and those from a de-culturalised background give up. They cannot take refuge in a smaller cultural world like the elites who live in large houses in posh areas of London, or beautiful English villages as country gentlefolk. They lose heart and, having nowhere to go descend into vices and viciousness; they are no longer civilized and do not know how to behave. They become prey to amoral meritocrats who use and exploit them.
2056.***E-XI/19/1997. On the character and competence needed for an effective and safe use of liberty. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-2.)
She leaves an address and a time. Tomorrow night. She makes it so easy for him. He feels that strange combination again, fear, arousal, shame, excitement. He closes the window, shuts down the computer and shuffles up the stairs to bed. Heaving into it he leans over, hips back so she can’t tell he’s aroused. He kisses her, once, on the neck, aching to bite, but he can’t and he won’t.
I've only started reading the volume but so far every story I've read in it -- which is to say the first one, "The Case of Death and Honey" by Neil Gaiman -- is excellent.
Please feel free to share your stories with me or to reach out for support. Perhaps if Any of us can reach out to others to help, then others will be able to educate their spouses, their teachers and their friends.
"No idea. He got kicked out..again."
Thank goodness for Pinterest! I was doing some research on Pinterest and came across a pin for girl hairstyles. I’ve really been wanting to find some neat ideas for new hair do’s for Maya since generally her hair falls in her face and doesn’t really last in its style longer than an hour or two. Her growing-out bangs have been driving me crazy too; they’re always in her face!
I Don't Know What I'm Doing
Image - Daisy girl from the digi doodle shop (they have some fab images)
The novel takes place in 1987 in New York City - mostly in Harlem - and is told from the viewpoint of Clareece "Precious" Jones, who is 16. We find out very soon into the novel that she is obese, illiterate (she's in middle school still) and pregnant with her second child (the product of her rape at the hands of her father - her first, also the product of rape at the hands of the same man, was born when Precious was 12 and has down syndrome). Precious lives with her mother, who supports Precious with food stamps and welfare. Precious' first child lives with her grandmother. As the novel opens, Precious is sitting in math class and is called to the guidance counselor's office because they have learned that she is pregnant. The school has opted to send her to an alternative school, which infuriates Precious. However, the pre-GED class taught by Ms. Blue Rain and featuring other girls from troubled backgrounds has a tremendous impact on Precious and leads to her confidence growing.
Big Banking
Bogus:
About this mess:
Gillian has kindly agreed to visit tall tales & short stories to talk about writing and her latest book, FIREBRAND – the first book in the Rebel Angels series.
with grace,
“Give me to food as you do so then,” Brulee said, standing up from the kneeling position she had held moments before. Her arms outstretched for the food selection Creme had made and was still holding, and Creme bundled it over, trying and succeeding in not spilling any of the food to the ground.
2011 has been a year of healing for us. After losing two babies the year before (one from an ectopic pregnancy and one from a miscarriage), I started the year pregnant. I had a wonderful pregnancy and wasn't ready for it to end. Two weeks before my due date in June our precious boy, Gideon, was born in an exhilarating yet challenging homebirth. I faced a lot of my own demons while birthing him but managed to push through that and experience another amazing birth.
800ml hot vegetable stock
Dec 7 Rohstofflager Zurich, Switzerland
to learn to enjoy ourselves. In Ireland, people just play music all
The priest says, "What did he ask, Mary?"
A month ago, I had the anxiety dream in which I showed up at the wedding and still hadn't bought the correct shoes (I ended up marching down the aisle in combat boots; my brain decided to add the creative detail to the dream of having all the bridesmaids carry candles instead of bouquets. "Just don't let the candles blow out," the bride's mother warned us as she sent us down the aisle. Of course mine kept blowing out and I in my combat boots would have to scurry over to the sconces on the chapel wall and relight it several times during my short journey. None of the other bridesmaids had any such difficulties.). This was the dream that inspired me to go out and buy the damn shoes, which of course almost gave me gangrene (so did anyone want me to post the pictures I took of my foot infections?).
The result was an (unpublished, I believe, due to FBI objections) article titled "Anatomy of a Crime Wave", detailing Nussbaum's exploits. But what Nussbaum – and, it must be said, Marlowe's publisher, Gold Medal – really wanted to read was a sequel to The Name of the Game is Death. According to Josef Hoffman's Mystery*File piece, "Nussbaum suggested to Marlowe that he go through the novel for him, looking out for the elements which constituted the figure of the hero, and for ways in which the story might be continued. Nussbaum then produced an outline of the character for the series, gave him a name, and drew up a 60-page concept for the sequel." The name Nussbaum came up with was Earl Drake. (Presumably this means the couple of mentions of the Earl Drake alias in later editions of The Name of the Game is Death/Operation Overkill must have been inserted as part of the revisions and edits the novel underwent – see previous post.)
Goo: Not really. All I had to say I said on the witness stand. I stand by what I said that it was from me that the human race descended. Man came from apes! I know that is hard to accept. But it is true. Man is an animal! As I said; it all began on a far off distant shore after I met dear kind Mr Darwin. I slid out of the the sea and…
I am having such a bad weekend and just feel shitty! It all started last week, my boyfriend is working in California for now while I still live in S. Florida, my kids were crazy as hell last week I think everyone is ready to get out of school. My back has been hurting for months now and I finally decided to go to the chiropractor and I have to go back again this week because he wasn’t exactly sure what was wrong. I went to the farmers market and was having a great time I even bought a coconut to drink but then all of a sudden I “blew out my flip-flop” as Jimmy Buffett would say so I had to walk all the way back to my car barefoot along main street (gross)!
If you want to create a warm and inviting home, but you like to change fragrances regularly, or scented candles are an impractical option, then wickless wax melts may be just the solution to create a welcoming home after a hard day.
Also coming away from the exhibition feeling underwhelmed, my benefactor Edward.
As writers, we have lots of in-between times, too. We can be in between a completed project and the beginning of a new one, in between ideas, in between periods of inspiration, in between the time we send off a manuscript and the time we hear back, in between the time a manuscript is sold and the time a book is released, in between sales of books, in between agents, in between critique groups, and more.
2 tbsp coriander leaves (chopped)
I wonder if perhaps I might
Good luck and thank you so much for coming along with me on this journey to getting the fabric line up & running. I never would have had the confidence or energy to do this if it weren't for so many of you, encouraging me & just being there. I really appreciate it & just knowing you're reading does more for me than I can even describe. Thank you.
Anyway, I dedicate this post to her. (Grandma, I apologize for the use of profanity and the mentioning of alcohol and birth control in your post. Though I feel like you will forgive me since it’s partly your genetics that makes this family so bonkers.)
This beautiful hand made Plant pick is hand made featuring a smaller flower with leopard prints and each topped with a sparkly jewel. The flower rest on a pick that can be stuck into a plant or other arrangements to bring a slash of color to a once dull area!
Of course... I need reminders just like everyone else from time to time. I think this part of the verse is a hard one to really grasp onto and practice.
“I have to adjust to the different soccer landscape in this country, adjust to the fact that 75 to 80 percent of the players are overseas, some in Mexico, so they’re all over the place. They come in from all different backgrounds, so that’s a bit of a different challenge. I just take things the way they are, and then I look for solutions and I look for ways to communicate with them in their own ways. Maybe I have to adjust and use Twitter and Facebook to get hooked to them and get a message out to them, which I hadn’t done before. So as a coach, it’s important that you kind of analyze your environment and say OK, based on what you’ve seen now, this is what you have to do and you have to change the way of doing things. It’s important to get the messages out to the players and that they understand why we do certain things, why we want to encourage them to look at things a little bit different. Every one of them has lived their daily lives in a very different way, and so we have to figure out how we get things across to them and hopefully make them step-by-step a little bit better in everything that they’re doing.”
We are responsible for our actions. We must make a conscious decision to not simply react or behave in a way that just feels good for the moment. We need to weigh the choices so both our actions and our communication serve to enhance our relationships rather than destroy them. The only time it is beneficial to ignore negative behavior is when you are dealing with someone who is giving you the silent treatment. The same technique works on children, friends and co-workers. First, tell them you are totally aware of their attempts to get even with you for some “injustice.” Then go about your business and just let them sulk until they decide to deal with the problem in a more mature, assertive way. You will be okay.
This happens on a small level, too. When reading the rough draft of Insurgent, someone confused one character with another to the point that it changed her interpretation of a substantial part of the story. My first instinct was to say "no, no, she read it wrong, that was someone else," but my next thought was, "you know, if she didn't realize that she was mixing characters up, I probably didn't make them distinct enough." And making each character feel distinct and separate and unique was something I worked on in my next round of revisions.
David reached out left and right, up, front and back, but felt nothing. He felt down around him, and it was solid enough to stand so he reached up again, still nothing. He wanted to talk or call out, but he was afraid that he’d either hear nothing or, worse, wake something up. He put his arms out and tapped his right foot out. The ground seemed solid, so he planted and stepped again. He reached, tapped, planted, and stepped about twenty times before coming to something. He pulled his hands back quickly, not knowing what it was, then touched again. He felt small, loose pieces on his fingers. He touched again as he inhaled and decided it was a wall of dirt. He was underground.
We’re taking January off to plan the winter/spring activities. Some things to look forward to:
I mentally paused. We were silent while I regrouped. I recognized the feeling of being attacked. It was the same day as my conversation with E. It was fresh in my mind. I realized that I felt as if Jack were rejecting a part of me. And then I heard E
Contrary to applicant's apparent contention, the fact that there is no evidence of use by others of THEATL as a single term does not compel a finding that the mark is not descriptive. It is not necessary that the evidence show use by others in the exact manner in which it is displayed as a mark. See In re SPX Corp., 63 USPQ2d 1592 (TTAB 2002). The point is that the evidence in this case shows use of the very combination of terms applicant is seeking to register. . . .
These are photos, you can use them if you like, but I think it best to pick one that suits you.
I am fucking free. And the best part of everything, is I finally realize it is all worth nothing. There is nothing to fear. I stood for what I wanted and didn’t relent. I didn’t crumble and go weak like I thought I would. The animal in me is so frighteningly sure, so confident that there is nothing that can touch me. I can make my own path, I just have to choose it.
bloody sand smells,
They come to extract a price from the sheep
bloodied body of the store owner and interrupts the attempted rape of the owner's daughter, Jolene. Josh recognizes the motorcycle gang's logo as that of the notorious Outlaws, a vicious biker gang he's dealt with in the past. In his rescue of Jolene, Josh kills one biker and holds another for arrest. He and Jolene join forces to prevent further attempts by the Outlaws to avenge their fallen brother and eliminate witnesses to the murder. Holed up at Josh's isolated farm, he and Jolene survive an all-out
LOUIS ARMSTRONG:
For my appointment, I dressed like a Mormon. I looked like I hadn't been laid in 20 years (unfortunately not too far from the truth): pleated knee-length skirt, puffy-sleeved blouse buttoned to my chin, don't-come-fuck-me pumps. He didn't notice. He was impressed, instead, by the thickness of my dossier, and the two professionally-bound copies obligatoires. He said, "Wow, you're serious about this." Uh. No. I'm just a fluffy girl without a brain in her head who thought she might want to live in France so she can drink wine and eat cheese. Jayzuz. (OK, the wine and cheese part is true but I'm definitely not fluffy.)
“The second picture I did was for Allied Artists and was titled Unwed Mother, a very provocative title for the late fifties. It starred Timothy Carey, an actor who had scored in Stanley Kubrick’s Paths of Glory alongside Kirk Douglas. In our picture, Timothy played the role of an abortionist (also pretty frisky stuff for that time). When he arrived on the set to do his scene, dressed appropriately in a cheap dark suit, he opened his black medical bag and from it brought out some of the ugliest, vilest-looking knives, tools, hammers, and sundry stuff you’d likely see only in some triple-X horror movie. This bag had not been furnished by the prop department, nor was a bag of that kind mentioned in the script. It was all Timothy’s idea, and he had to be talked out of using it in his scene by the director, who threatened to have him fired and, if possible, kicked out of the Screen Actors Guild. He finally did acquiesce, and I heard very little about or from him since then.”
If you want to make an argument, keep some things in mind:
We finished our landscaping! That is good too? Wanna see a picture? I don't know if I should post one, because I don't even know if I have a good "before" picture. So, maybe not.
It can be perceived as a personal attack - that being skinny is not okay, that we are built wrong and that we are unwomanly.
arctic chill —
Wrong again. I asked the the ultrasound technician how the fluid looked because they are now measuring it in centemeters due to its size. Ruben asked her what that measurement was in milimeters, and the technician said very calmly that she thought it might be a bit bigger. She paused and said "it's at 11mm." I immediately started crying as the technician walked out.
Finally, since my friend asked for the information broken out by race, it's worth noting that non-Hispanic white folks made up 34% of marijuana cases over this period compared to 48.7% of the population citywide in Austin, according to the 2010 census. Meanwhile, black folks make up just 8.1% of Austin's population, but a whopping 28.1% of petty marijuana cases. Latinos are the only one of the three largest ethnic categories who are arrested and cited for marijuana at roughly their proportion in the general population. Whether the disparity is driven by race or whether race is a proxy for other factors - like police deployment decisions - I cannot say. But I don't understand why the number of marijuana cases should be rising, and I certainly don't understand why black folks would be targeted so much more frequently for enforcement. Don't kid yourself. There are a LOT of white pot smokers in this town.
The eulogies gave Mara no comfort. The memories did not bring her daughter back. They only spotlighted everything she had lost and served as a reminder of everything she would never have again. The kind words were salt on an open wound. The wavering voices made her ache with sadness and then it was Luke’s turn to speak.
As House and 13 wait for the morphine drip to take effect, small talk ensues as the medicine drips into 13′s veins. Remy, (13) admits to House that she always had a thing for him and would have “So done him” alone and with several of her girlfriends if only he would have asked. House smacks his head and calls himself an idiot. 13 smiles as House injects a syringe of medicine into her veins and she slowly loses consciousness.
5. Award to 15 or more bloggers.
Well Newt got his Super Pac money :
The latest such defense was put up by Gabriel Latner, a 19-year-old Cambridge student, at a recent debate of the prestigious university’s debating society centered on the motion that “Israel is a rogue state.” His speech was called by The Irish Independent “the most brilliantly audacious defence of Israel since Moses parted the Red Sea.”
18. We're Not Alone Anymore
The fish were specifically 'caught' for Mr. Manpants. But this deliciously-cheesy cracker made us all happy.
My first encounter left me astonished: The somehow naked originals were treated by this bunch of experimental remixers in such a wonderfully insightful way that the reusults are nothing but outstanding and unbelievably warm.
The first lynching since 1912, the murder of Willie Earle became big news. The trial was biggest lynching trial the state had ever seen. Most lynchings had never even been investigated, while this one had then-Governor Strom Thurmond threatening to put the perpetrators away (yes, you read that right). Time magazine sent reporters, and The New Yorker sent no less than Dame Rebecca West to cover the event.
13. Everything Ends
Stampin' Supplies:
Add the lemon juice, lemon peel, and extract to the chilled sugar mixture; stir until well blended. Pour into the chilled metal pan.
My mother had remarkable zeal for Christmas. Weeks in advance, she would come home from teaching school and bake late into the night. I helped clean the house and decorate the tree while my older brother Roger wired the house with Christmas lights, transforming our humble red house into a place of magical beauty. Following the church candlelight service, a crowd of happy people crunched through the snow to our house for cocoa and cookies.
we continue our analysis of
I have recently started my passion for paper crafting and I am so blown by it that I would love to share my projects with you all.
Only such a normalized situation, which allows for free political activity, can allow us to consult our people in order to obtain a mandate.
I thought these mugs were so fun and easy. I have some chalkboard wine glasses from Pier One that I love and I adore coffee and hearts so I mayyyy just have to make some of these for myself. And the fun part is you could make the heart in any color!
Emotionally, I feel very far away from Karla May, my dear friend in Austin who is going thru so much right now, and I feel horrible that I am so far away and can't just be there for her. Take her out, get her a beer, talk and commiserate, you know? Part of me will never understand the depths of what she is feeling, and part of me feels it right along with her. It's really hard to feel so useless.
I know it's been several weeks since I've posted anything significant, and I hope my fellow bloggers won't kick me off their blogrolls for inactivity. I'm trying to put parts of my life together--more on that later--and I just haven't had time to think about my card collection in a while. Thank you so much to my 26 loyal followers and I promise to start posting again soon.
First and foremost, I am not a racist. While I do believe that there is nothing unchristian about loving your own kind (ethnically, culturally and even racially) I do believe that hating another kind is a great sin against both God and man. As Christians we are certainly allowed to love our own, but we are forbidden to hate others. Am I proud of my ancestry? Sure. Why wouldn't I be? Do I hate or dislike other people's ancestry? Of course not! What purpose would that serve?
Buses can be held for up to 6 hours in the road side inspection places whilst being assessed for mechanical defects and and driving breaches. It is an outrageous action and as the RTA officer told Bob, they were just following orders from above. Bob told me that Kevin Humphries was also outraged by this and was talking about taking it to the highest possible authorities.
I'm off now to see what I can come up with for a cake for Alan's birthday for tomorrow, pictures tomorrow of it if its a success lol, if not Dishcloth challenge update on Thursday and YOP update on Sunday.
As you know, all of the girls that I've created for the card line are city girls.
I love being down here, even if my pants are getting wet... She is a metal life form. An entity of hydraulics, electricity, pneumatics, and circuit boards. An exotic winged creature of lift, velocity, and thrust.
I'm a keen observer. I watch people, I read how they react to situations, to me, to anything. I'm aware. I know how to take social cues and when to back off. I make it a point to identify a person's level of comfort and their boundaries and I tread on the right side of those. Seems like it's a dying practice. I'm just going to break some of it down.
My experience with the midwives and their assistants was like nothing I had ever come across in the UK. They made every appointment seem special. They never rushed anything, they were always willing to discuss anything and everything, and they all seemed genuinely excited as the weeks ticked by and December approached. I had a great pregnancy and felt at peace and excited as well as I waited for my Mum & Dad to arrive, praying that the baby would wait too!
I hope that the weather is nice where you are. It is finally getting sunny here in Calgary Yay! Before we get to this week's challenge (inspired by the great weather I may add) it's time to announce last week's winners. Thanks to all who participated.
but deliver us from evil.
Dinner: Stroganoff, egg noodles, steamed green beans, fresh fruit
“That’s what I told you, Betty! In no way is he normal!”
In other news, my grandma is almost done with her Chemo and the last blood test showed that she is 1 point from remission. We are all so thrilled and thankful that she will have more time with us. My aunt is progressing in her treatment and has had a double mastectomy and is just starting her Chemo, so please keep her in your prayers.
Soon, Wit and Charm were an item, misinterpreted by people such as Seduction, Chastity and Fear. They married a year later, giving life to the children named Beauty, Laughter and Impulse.
Clash Of Views
Helpings yous feels stationarys
I wanted to make the cookies match the baby shower invitations, so I used orange royal icing to outline half of the cookies, and blue/grey royal icing to outline the rest. It took me a while to match the blue color to the one in the invitations, but I ended up mixing in royal blue, black, and a teeny bit of purple to achieve the right shade.
I also sent out a baby quilt the same day. Little Eden wasn't due for another week or so but she surprised everybody and arrived early. Her quilt arrived just a day later. I had a hard time deciding what to do for her quilt. All I knew was that it had to be predominantly pink and had to have Minkee on the back because that's what I put on the back of her brother's quilt almost 7 years ago. And yes, he still uses his quilt everyday. I've known little Eden's mama since she was about 6 or 7. She's an identical twin and her Mom used to paint their toenails to tell them apart--yup, pink & blue. To this day, Mom's favorite color is still pink. After several false starts, I started seeing granny square blocks popping up all over the internet. Inspiration struck and I started digging into my stash.
Read "Lord of the Flies" by William Golding for an excellent illustration of how otherwise good people can act really bad.
Cue the screams….
In loving woman's heart is always full of hope, to kill them, you need more than one stab, she loves to the last drop of blood.
